I have to give you points for complexity. This one is a doozy.   *Edit: (Not actually an edit since I am still typing this)*  [Leaderboard](https://www.reddit.com/r/shittyriddles/wiki/index)
Get OFF the dating sites!  It's really impossible to meet someone that way!  Believe me, it happens to the best of us.  You know why?  Because we have expectations when we go through the online process. Meeting someone in a coffee shop and accidentally spilling your coffee on them, is more organic.  It's natural.  Go with that.  It's real. Dating via Tinder -- you don't get a clear picture of who is on there to be validated, by the amount of likes they get, or if they are serious about finding someone. Just go find something you're interested in and do that.  The right person will come along at the right time when you're ready.
For the Citigold checking my friend got a little behind on keeping track of when stuff had to be done by. He sent the remaining debit spend requirement through Venmo on the 26th but it won't post until 3/1 and his debit spend deadline was 2/29. Since the charge was initiated before the deadline but will post after, is he SOL? He doesn't currently have enough money in the account anymore to meet the required spend through POS pin transaction.  *Edit: Realized that he chatted with Citi and that CSR said the conditions were met, but he also SMed them and that CSR said that he had yet to meet the debit spend. He saved the chat log just in case, but which CSR is more likely to be right?
Definitely. There's no a.
Subscribe: /paradigmblue
Thats what I like to hear! Hahaha. Thanks for all your help man. 
Kang Rue the barbarian king who cut a line through the Zyllian empire and formed a kingdom mostly consisting of a single huge trade route that went through the entire continent.  Kang's great grandchild Laurein Rue noticed that the great barbaric kingdom was falling and so set up trade agreements with the neighboring empires and kingdoms and also formed the Rue bay merchants guild (now commonly known as the ruby merchants guild).  Today this road is known as the ruby road and is still a main trade route used mostly by major trade guilds and travelers. Security wanders the road as well making it relatively safe against bandits and similar threats.
It's not.  The size of the house was over the top for a man who lives alone.  That was my observation.
GvG's more meta builds and skills stayed pretty static/balanced and really that was the only PvP anyone took seriously, including Anet....for a time at least.   Sure certain novelty builds/team compositions (Sin-split/Dervish  enchant bombers, Paragods etc, etc) would pop up or sneak in after a patch from time to time but they usually got nerf-batted pretty quickly which was due in part to the skill splits. A quick tweak PvP side and imba build is gone. Unless my memory serves me incorrectly for most of it's life span while populated GW1's GvG was quite tight on it's balancing with most teams running mirror-like builds and team compositions with only subtle variations on a pretty stable and balanced meta.  Sure the other modes were often a circus but they were'nt really designed to be taken that seriously anyway.  GW2's main problem is it can't even balance the one PvP game mode it wants to be an E-Sport properly in a game with simpler mechanics and far less PvP modes. When compared to GW1's GvG, the main game mode Anet pushed as it's "top-tier" PvP E-Sport mode in that game, it seems vastly inferior in terms of balance.  A split can only help.  In saying I admit to only playing GvG regularly in GW1 for 3 years or so, even though I kept up with what was going on there after burning out on it, hence there may be a lot I missed and my glasses may be more rose-tinted than they should be.
Changing his mind and owning up to that is one thing that I actually really respect about Trump.  I also think that sometimes he isn't changing his mind so much as just shooting from the hip. That is a whole other matter.  edit: these aren't even policy positions I am talking about - did you watch the video?
Maybe someone could start a feminine product exchange, in the style of government-funded needle exchanges for intravenous drug users. Well, I don't mean a *literal* exchange, but you could make oddly similar arguments about public health and safe/reliable sanitary options.   I have met several women who have resorted to asking strangers in public restrooms for a spare tampon/pad because they couldn't afford a whole pack.  I used to teach art classes for pre-teen/teenagers at several community centers, where my students ran into similar issues. It seemed like the sort of thing their schools could have made discretely available, but, of course, didn't. 
Agreed. The KKK has been killing people and infiltrating police departments for years. Their side of the situation decided on violence, coercion, terror, etc... as the answers decades ago.  It should also go without saying that, on the counter-protesters' side, this incident is a glaring exception to the rule. 99.999% of the people standing against white supremacy, police overreach, etc... do so using non-violent means.
On the other hand, there's [great disparity](http://www.measureofamerica.org/maps/) across the US, social services are meager, infrastructure is underdeveloped and crumbling ... Compare America's ghettos and Canada's, for example. There's a huge difference in quality of life.
the only thing lost here is your skills XDDDDDDDDDDD  oh wait you cant lose something that doesnt exist 
Not sure if it's intentional but in the new render the blade clips into the ground
What is your best eSports moment as a player and what is the best series you have casted?
Yes! Absolutely go vote if you can. The delegates are split proportionally, so every vote counts. Berries sucess on ST depends on his supporters showing up in states where he might get demolished.
rookie hypeeeeeeeeeee
it will warm up
And how else can Dean really win?
I will also recommend podcasts. It's like hanging out and listening in on a conversation. The Tim Ferris Podcast and Radio Lab are some places to start.
Well Yi not every game banned but most than others,xin also not every game and jax banned because of top.Havent seen a jax devourer jungle in so long.You said if i have noticed how many bans go to devourer junglers and its 1-2 max in low elo.Have you played in feral flare days when almost all bans where feral junglers? And yeah people dont know how to play against yi and xin and thats why they picked and banned so much in low elo.  And yeah there are op champions and items and Devourer isnt one of them.Win rates are meaningless to me and those kids here in reddit are using them for whatever reason they want.When something has high winrate is op and it needs nerf but when they cant play against something that hasnt high winrate they dont mention the winrate at all and find other reasons to explain their bullshit.
Omg, this is uncanny. Maybe we are soul mates?   What was your dream about?? 
You could try to clear the jungle with Xin Zhao in a custom game, if it works you are capable to try it in a normal game ;) Otherwise like Transmogulater said: Pick WW
Black Mountain Rag by Doc Watson (https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=XdUrg2Cqxdw) or Church Street Blues by Tony Rice (https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9JFgC3Ub10E).
  [Neat.](http://i.imgur.com/pEUfrLv.gif) Snapshots:  1. *This Post* - [1](https://archive.is/jcESi), [2](https://web.archive.org/20160229235957/http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/48caft/wine_and_chocolate_pineapple/d0ijl4t), [3](http://megalodon.jp/2016-0301-0859-57/www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/48caft/wine_and_chocolate_pineapple/d0ijl4t)  *^(I am a bot.) ^\([*Info*](/r/SnapshillBot) ^/ ^[*Contact*](/message/compose?to=\/r\/SnapshillBot))*
They nerfed flat pen outside of jungle item, bruta was fucking great item to shit on squishies
Has it even been 5000 hours since it was released yet? 
What's the blue stuff in the cup?
&gt; Lallana will leave.  I can see why you might think that but he's been pretty good this season and Klopp seems to rate him too, even if it's only as an impact player.
i've seen clans use apcs "properly" and it didn't evolve hiding.  trust me, a coordinated siege with an apc who runs havoc on your point is not funny. especially if the driver knows what he's doing cuz the only way to down that moving fucker is with precise PF shots and not simply with stickies or H3
Not really, there's a long going on, you're just not the one doing it. 
lay the foundation pupper
$30  every month seems way too high IMO. 
What do you mean "now"?
I can't imagine Shaw would tell the AD "no" if it was strongly suggested that he ought to go.  I think part of it is how Shaw wants to de-emphasize the importance of the rivalry and the Big Game, which is his prerogative--but rivalries like this don't just grow on trees. Pull some weight, Stanfurd.
These guys have some decent boxing. Both pump the jab a lot in the fight. In sure these guys have came up putting in some serious rounds together. 
How about a vacation where you both can do what you want in one city.  You want museums. She wants warm, sunny weather.   My vote is Mexico City. It has some of the best museums in the world. The weather will be perfect in march. It's super cheap compared to NYC so you can spend more time there without spending a fortune. There are activities for both of you to enjoy. 
"well...I can visit often...but if you change your mind I live with a lot of people that lost their homes. as long as you dont mind a couch or the basement I am sure nobody would mind you staying" *she purrs* "but I will let you do as you want. it is your life"
Honestly didn't know Tenay was a radio host first
Nah. My old tortie was pretty much normal for what you'd consider a cat to feel like. That might just have to do with genetics in some way, since torties can come from most domestic felines.
Probably have this bug :(  https://code.google.com/p/android/issues/detail?id=196035
It's so beautiful
I work with the Overnight Program that allows people to make reservations and come aboard at night for personal tours. When the tours are over we send them to bed in the classmates where the sailors slept. And I either go to bed in our office or just explore with a coworker. With permission first of course 
Lethal write up, didnt know about the two new expansion teams. People write the MLS as a place to come go to die but it has really help resurrect Robbie Keane's prowess for the Irish team and for that i will always thank the MLS.
Is there actual footage of the thing working properly in game? Dubstep-laden promos like these can be misleading
It can also be in the oddest restaurants. We had an Indian place near where we lived in DC that has great pizza; I think it is because the dough is based off of their naan dough (which they slather in melted butter). They made a Greek pizza with lamb, feta, peppers, onions, and some other seasonings that was amazing.
you mean those unbearably loud synths? and the awkwardly used vocal sample on top of those synths?  the beat is horrific on that song and damn near makes it unlistenable.
I'm a woman, and no. It isn't okay to call someone a rapist unless you know for a fact they are.
Thanks so much.
Yeah I doubt Blizzard will ever release stats that would make the playerbase realise how bad most of them are.  They're happy to tell us that rank 15 is in the top 10% of all players (or whatever the actual numbers are) because that takes into account all the millions of inactive accounts. But letting the casuals know exactly how many games they're losing would be bad for business.  I'd be all for fun, random stats though. Stuff like "how many Doomsayers have you dropped from Shredder".  And Arena seriously needs something like a monthly leaderboard, or really any love at all.
Trump is an asshole but he comes off as genuine.  Hillary is nice but comes off as disingenuous.  It's an anti establishment year.
Bike helmets are sort of a pet peeve of mine. Anytime you cancel a (non-sport) bike ride due to a lack of a helmet, you get a net decrease in life expectancy compared to riding without the helmet. The health benefits of biking far outweigh the risks of accidents.  MTB, bike racing and so on may be another matter.
Let me second this!  I'm a high handicapper. Went to a GolfSmith thinking a new driver would fix my woes. Got on the simulator and proceeded to solidly hit 5 out of 10 drives. The rest were tops or off the toe.  Dude was really cool and basically said "you don't need a new driver, you need lessons/practice". Really thankful for the honesty and knowing it's not the equipment, it's the handler. I just need to get much more consistent before the fitting will make a difference for me.
What's interesting is, assuming the most likely schedule of SAO III in Spring/Summer '17 and SAO IV in Spring/Summer '19, the English release of Vol 18 (Dec '19) will be shortly after its anime counterpart finishes airing.  Also, we'll have all the English releases done *just* before 2020. :D
Glenn Beck is a great example of the evolution of a self proclaimed prophet. First he was trying to do the right thing, then trying to do what god wants him to do, then claiming god speaks to him directly. It's nuts
[Naegi:](http://41.media.tumblr.com/a7c833353bc07ee541e813742331eae7/tumblr_n0qgbdAcEX1s9stt8o6_500.png) well...continuing about nekomaru-kun's death...it's safely to say he died by being shot...But we still haven't find out the meaning behind the plastic bag on his face. Also, we haven't find out the why of kazuichi-kun's letter was inside of his pockets...
LGR!
&gt; younger audience   How old are you, if you don't mind me asking?
Wow! I love it, and I'm sorry about the blowout.  I would color-correct with a red or orange color-corrector and then use KVD or Dermablend on top. I'm sure there are cheaper alternatives, but those are the best I've tried. I also had a weird amount of luck using my Naked Skin concealer and some setting powder.
Not my first $10, not my last. You made me care about the future of this country like nobody ever has. You made me believe that there is hope in a country where everything is bought by the rich and powerful. You made me believe that we can fight climate change and science-deniers in this country. I doubt you'll read this far, but you are my hero Bernie 
Hi Dad
I could drown in the number of those I've received
Honestly, it has more to with the environment, some plants grow fast and aggressively, some grow tall and big. The fast growing ones tend to need lots of light and can never get it and don't get all that big. I believe the sumacs mostly fall into that category, others grow slower but get bigger (your normal forest trees like oak). So you got some plants that specialize in throwing seeds that grow in freshly disturbed soil and others that specialize in more of a forest type condition, oak won't do that well the first few years on the side of the road because grasses out grow it and starve it of light.  Anyways, the side of the road is generally "freshly disturbed soil and full sun", where the forest is generally shady and undisturbed, that's why what you see on the side of the road is very different than what you find in a forest.
More practically ambitious than Mad Max, a film shot in the desert based solely on storyboards that used mostly practical effects, had massive amounts of difficult stuntwork and elaborate sets?  Or more ambitious from a storytelling perspective than turning the housing crisis into a comedy or telling a story about a mother and son held captive by the father of the child? The Revenant was a standard revenge western that essentially cribbed as much from Jeremiah Johnson, a previous iteration of the same story as it did from the actual source material.  The only thing that made it particularly ambitious was the incompetent planning. Hell, even this whole natural lighting bullshit...that shit's been around since the 1970s.  So it's not like he was breaking technical ground there.  Don't get me wrong. He made a decent flick.  But the idea that he out concepted everyone on The Revenant ignores the competition and the history of the western and cinema in general.  
Your hi point or bad puns and photoshop?
Sir alex
&gt; All products lightly used.  Add $3 for shipping.
that depends, mostly, on the archer's form. if they have good form and are shooting tight groups, it happens a small but notable amount of the time.   it almost always ruins the arrows though. wooden arrows, the nock at the back splits off unevenly and renders the arrow useless. aluminum arrows get distorted and can be bent(also the nocks are ruined again). carbon arrows can blow up(which is super dangerous). cane/bamboo arrows(common in asian archery) split from nock to point depending on how they're made and look like those old robin hood movies. 
One of those electric powered ones kids drive
Technically Far Cry 4 is not set in either. so fuck it.
Dragon vs Nigel at ROH Driven 2007. A classic hard hitting war between the two that I had the privilege of seeing live.
It's a Marchesa. A very very ugly Marchesa.
Um, "murder bar?" 
I think the main question should be: Why are you dating me then? My dating history is not really your concern if anything, if you are going to be that kind of person then maybe I shouldn't be around with someone so immature.   I really think you should break up with this person and just move on, because guys who do this kinda shit just irk the fuck out of me and they really don't make it good for themselves. 
Yeah, my mom's family is all from Pittsburgh, but a lot of them have moved around the country. My cousin in her 50's likes and shares Steelers stuff All. The. Time. The rest of the family then shares or likes those.   I like r/steelers. It's a quiet, respectable group. 
Definitely could be regional. Lol, your mom. TWO friends named Renee Nicole. 
Virtue signalling. They're showing other people that *they* aren't racist. It's almost like they're compensating.
I have a folder that contains all the dick photos I've received.   If I get sent a dick photo, I will send back a bigger one. 
I woke up this morning to us being $4 million short of the goal, and we're less than a million short now. Don't stop everyone! I just chipped in for the third time in this campaign, and I'm more inspired than ever.
How did you do on your practice tests? Was this outside of the norm? It's possible you had a bad test day - remember, you can retake the test for a better score! If you normally do better than 153 I would take it again and see how you do.
Pfffft. Sorry, on mobile atm.
God bless the USA
I think toffoli is confirmed ctoty isn't he?
ROFLOL......  just adding some humor.
That's not enough. 
I can recite the entire "You Can't Handle the Truth!" monologue from a Few Good Men (I'm not an actor or anything, but I can do it verbatim)
To many it that production of DBZ was the first they saw the series. Many would argue it ruined it, and many others would say the dubbing was awful. I grew up watching db and dbz in spanish and it had the original scores, but I did indeed enjoy faulconers scores as it added a different tone. Look at imperfect cell and majin buu saga music, it added the cryptic mood for the first and the second added the innocents of the fat buu, the wild and erratic aggresive behavior of the other buus.  Like most have said it all comes down to prefference.
I would have at least pretended to be a chinese tourist and shit on the path.
Well, that explains why Weequay sound like the Didact from Halo 4. :P
Toon Link has been sold out for a while and hasn't been restocked yet. Give it time, he'll return some day.  As for Target and TRU, those are probably third party sellers who are selling through Target/TRU. I know for a fact that all major retailers sell amiibo figures for $13 ($14 at TRU).
that's another awesome sub!
Pennybot, Approve. 
[Shiki's opening is really cool.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Iw5u3QVdHjA) Old animation style, but still a great horror tale in the end.
I have just one problem, my car broke down and it's done.  Engine blew so I'm just dealing with that now.  I'll let you know if I get on for some chel.  We will 100% either today or tomorrow.  Just pretty rough day so far lol. 
Alright thanks for the tips! I will try my hardest to be Reignover. 
&gt; 15  I just donated twice,  $15 at a time!  Extra $30 coming from East Texas!  EDIT: Proof http://i.imgur.com/IMBoUPL.png  Match Me?!
the old school hard-asses from the 70s, 80s, and 90s.  Though, you can't really call them pro climbers.  
My impression from early on was that her predecessors also used private email for similar work. Is that true? Is this enforcing a new standard?
my 8 for your 5
It's a step, what don't you understand about that? Lmao. The country has really been through the ringer for the past 40 years. All the Wahabbism and corruption isn't going to disappear over night, but this concert is a huge step forward. If you don't think so it's cool, but how many other Grammy winning artists have come to Pakistan in the last 50 years?
Ah, smart fellow! Well, outside the GVRD region, there certainly are some solid options if you can find work there - enjoy it!
Not on PrEP yet but I've heard many say that the dizziness / nausea tend to subside after a few weeks.  I'd wait a little longer.
It's is probably shit methodology and if released would be torn to shit.
Wishes I had that money
Oh cool. Not really a fan of the song itself though.
Thank you :)
First of all it's more like docker-compose hub, where each application consists of multiple docker images. Puffin actually uses Docker Hub to download its images. Also each application is preconfigured to have small memory footprint and to be ready to use with no manual configuration.   Second of all Puffin allows you to actually run these applications via simple web interface - either on hosted platform (where there's no configuration required) or on you own server (where configuration is relatively simple).
I think of all our young D men, JJ has the lowest ceiling. I hope he does well he seemed like a swell guy. 
I stopped reading when that smartass called "private IP" to a "public IP" and kept telling you to get an education. Whatever.
As a US Citizen, I just can't seem to be sure I'm going to get a return on my tax investment to the government.  And for that reason, I'm out.   edit: ITT: People taking a Shark Tank joke way too seriously.  Get popcorn!   Edit 2: never do edit two, I'm drunk, it's okay. Why didn't anyone play shark tank with me? I'm so bummed you all had meaningfil discussions!!! 
Was the drivers name Dave W. ?
Yay isn't playing for Noble either, there best player. I'm going on AA. 
While I don't agree that a distinction can or should be made just because one enjoys an activity, and that trying to impose mores on a population has always had disastrous results in the past, I respect your opinion, and thank you for sharing it. **We are each free to do what we feel is right and just, until it interferes** with someone else's rights. I would equally defend your right to express your opinion as much as I would defend someone's right to wear a diaper in public, even though I personally agree with neither.  Here's another scenario for you:  A person is riding their bicycle, and the seat starts rubbing them in a pleasing way. They don't know what is happening,  only that it feels good, and they contiune riding until they orgasm. No one sees this happen, yet they have pleasured themselves in public. Do you fe this is wrong? Why or why not, and how is it different from any other situation where no one but the person who got off knows? What if they didn't orgasm, and just went on their way? 
You know, if the tattoos were done with reasonable artistic skill, it wouldn't be that bad. But it looks like it was done in a fucking prison cell by a five year old with no talent. What a fucking idiot.
No on both counts, unfortunately.
Is she a stripping Russian with loose morals? 
I have MANY questions
Bathtub race
what do you mean. I don't remember
* Username: insidetomorow * Join date: 2011-07-17 16:32:28 * Link karma: 16 * Comment karma: 1891 * Confirmed trades: None * Heatware: None  ^^This ^^information ^^does ^^not ^^guarantee ^^a ^^successful ^^swap. ^^It ^^is ^^being ^^provided ^^to ^^help ^^potential ^^trade ^^partners ^^have ^^more ^^immediate ^^background ^^information ^^about ^^with ^^whom ^^they ^^are ^^swapping. ^^Please ^^be ^^sure ^^to ^^familiarize ^^yourself ^^with ^^the ^^[RULES](https://www.reddit.com/r/hardwareswap/wiki/rules/rules) ^^and ^^other ^^guides ^^on ^^the ^^[WIKI](https://www.reddit.com/r/hardwareswap/wiki/index)
I always liked Pigeon, it let me sign into MSN, Y!, and Aim at the same time! 
&gt;I've tried using Hana a bit, I want to like her but as a character so far it's kind of been revolving around Sakura and disliking me. As a unit she's been able to get kills but mainly because of attack stance. her level fell a bit behind others I've used so I may need to boost her back up.  Yea her personality in the few supports I've read's a little limited. But I've read like 5 so I'm withholding judgement.   And Hinata's a ~~myrmidon~~ Samurai with good defense. Depending on their supports I may eventually choose him over Hana. Are you holding out for Ryoma?  &gt;Yeah it is a bit different, but I don't mind at all. Hopefully Oboro keeps being great since I'm liking her.  I don't mind either, just an observation. And I feel the same way, she's one of the units I had high hopes for before playing the game and she hasn't disappointed.   &gt; Yeah a friend of mine had the same thing happen as well. I may have to put up with it and use Takumi anyway just because of his insane bow.  I'd give him at least a few levels. All his growths minus Speed are better than Setsuna. Even without his special bow I'd use him. So nice having an archer that can take a hit. I just like archers this game in general. Reina really seems interesting, I just wish she had more supports besides with the MU.
Where did jumper cables come from?
Really, companies only have themselves to blame for this. Valuing stupid bullshit like "I'm really excited to work at x, I'm extremely interested in X aspect of your company." has caused it to become the norm and other insulting shit like "great organizational skills, management skills, working in a fast paced environment" and other tired cliches that mean nothing are required to get in the door.
"...To be fair, that happens a lot more than you'd think."   *He laughs along with her.*   "Come on!  Let's kills some people!"
Winter with snow, however, is a different story: being up yesterday the rock pile before the scramble, as you come out of the trees the first time, was already becoming dangerous with the accumulating layer of snow. When it gets wet or snowy up there the change is pretty severe.
Wow, Retard much? Manson did not physically murder anybody. The person you want to mention is Jeffery Dahmer.
Niiiice. I got one of the above mentioned and its loose as hell and occasionally leaky
That whore
These guys know how to live.
Yes it is. Now the servers are working okay again (its after midnight), I have to wait until tomorrow evening to test if another browser or incognito mode will fix this issue. The only thing I know for sure is, that using another CDN (through tunneling everything through a proxy) fixes this issue. 
Please look up the meaning of progressive taxation.
Times is hard.
Thank you, I was just curious.  I wasn't trying to make it seem like I was complaining.
At red rocks too! Fucking awesome!
In-flight entertainment is quite good. A lot of Hollywood blockbusters and a small selection of TV shows.  It's airplane food. As long as you don't go in with high expectations, you'll survive. On the JFK-Shanghai flight we got two hot meals and a half sandwich. On the Shanghai-Singapore flight, we got one hot meal. It's generally a choice of meat with either rice or noodles. There is usually some fruit, a small "salad" and a fresh roll. One meal had a small packet of Biscoff cookies.
But that's not an off-season, that's a rotating roster. People get scheduled time off while others get spotlighted instead.
You're not my mom! I'll be edgy and tell people voting is useless!!! 
&gt; I made  No you didn't
This will probably get buried, but [Justice Thomas speaks up in court](https://youtu.be/_y6H6KbeEwo) [2013]
I'm sad bro.
not in and of itself, but he must be aware of the high human cost to get it from south america to his nostril. drug mules, murderous cartels, etc. 
Very good point, maybe i should stop being so selfish myself.
lol I'm not sure 
Ordered the Kevin Owens 'Prize Fighter' shirt and the Roman Reigns 'Empire' shirt for the young en! 
It's basically impossible for me to not upvote your posts. You're just so nice and helpful! It makes me happy to have such great contributors in this subreddit. Thank you!
Don't worry about what all these people are saying though, they are just a part of the reddit hivemind, and currently the hivemind thinks Nova is the shittiest hero in the game.  In good hands and in the right comp, she is still just as broken as ever though. Don't expect any upvotes for mentioning it though.
I have that as a custom on Rock Band 3. It's the perfect song for Rock Band!
This game is too fun! Can play this all day errryday 
I'm glad to hear more good things about gemvera. We went with them because my fiancé wanted a ring that better matches mine, and hated the ones in stores.
***TONIGHT'S STARTING GOALIE SETUPS***  [PHI - Michal Neuvirth] (http://thegoalieguild.com/wp-content/uploads/padstracker/2016/Neuvirth001.jpg)  [CGY - Jonas Hiller] (http://thegoalieguild.com/wp-content/uploads/padstracker/2016/Hiller001.jpg)
I finally see it now... Fat Jimmy is the American Psy!
Should have been the 1990s
I tecommend to bind it because you have to use that command after every mapchange.   bind KEY ignorerad
Our RA does this for her boss who is faculty, but not for the students (because she doesnt work for us, we dont pay her). 
Wouldn't that be false advertisement if they put them in the screenshot art and then didn't include them in game? I hate to be a Debbie downer here but face it my dudes, DICE, EA, Disney or whoever is calling the shots might just be pulling a lazy move on us by including heroes that basically share the same character model as something already in game. For that reason alone is why I may skip out on this DLC, but as sure as I am, I'll wait for the conformation. Just not holding out much hope. 
Will put - /u/Turkeyoak made mention that some pocket holsters that allow the gun to fired while still holstered are technically AOW because at that point it doesn't look like a traditional gun. 
You've just answered, in a straightforward and sensible way, a question I've wondered about for years. 
Yes.
&gt;There is no way for apple to create this version of iOS for only one phone: if apple creates it, the FBI can install it on any phone they want.  As I understand it they theoretically could isolate the iOS, I'm assuming in some form of hardware, and plug it into the phone. Yes, I understand the concern about the FBI abusing the backdoor, those are the concerns of Apple, and I share them. Though the FBI has stated it is only interested in using it this once, for this one phone. I'm not saying I believe them, or that there is no potential for abuse, just relating the FBI's own statements.  It's not so much the track record of the FBI in regard to telling the truth that is concerning, but their track record on security. It was early this year that sixteen year old boys from Glasgow and Scotland hacked the FBI's emails and files. If a breach like that happened and exposed this backdoor that would be a massive security blunder. As I said before, creating the backdoor no matter who has custody over it, no matter if it is destroyed afterward, is a huge risk by itself. Once created the key would eventually get out into the world. This would open up every iPhone worldwide to being hacked by people with even a small amount of skill, not to mention foreign governments. 
[Edgy](https://thumbnail.mixcloud.com/w/300/h/300/q/85/upload/images/extaudio/8415e041-9975-47da-ba73-b2a4dec91050.jpg)
John cena
Agreed, If Serena was as good looking as Maria, she may be a bigger star as far as commercial endorsements go.
&gt; during his second interview that Adnan told him he planned to murder Hae and he gave Jay his car and his cell phone so he could get in touch with Jay to give him a ride thereafter  Yeah, that's a great point.  Jay claimed that he and Adnan had been planning the murder for 5 days, and that Jen knew about it in advance too.  But if there's every anything that he failed to mention, like that the reason for phoning  Nisha was to create a false alibi, it's always because Jay wanted to "minimise his involvement".
Aw this is wonderful! Do you mind if I share it on his instagram account?
It's really sad that some people get excluded because of the insane amount of money they would have to pay. Hopefully this will change in the near future.
Much love to you, our international **NIMBLE NAVIGATOR**  Flair up and Make Poland Great Again
Graças a esses babacas na minha universidade baniram qualquer tipo de trote, tinha calouro implorando pra ser pintado e a gente não podia fazer nada.  Ps. Agronomia... por que não estou surpreso?
[Blood for the Blood Rose!](http://orig00.deviantart.net/56d7/f/2014/315/8/5/blood_rose_by_skiretehfox-d861w7c.png)
2.5Ghz Intel Core i5 with 16GB Ram
As a fellow Russian I'd prefer this not be covered by 1tv  because nothing good can come out of this.  Actually RBK, RT, LifeNews, RenTV, EchoOfMsk, Lenta, and a lot of others covered the story.
Buillding on that idea: eye color. I know there are emerging surgeries that will turn brown eyes blue, but I think it would be cooler if we could get a shot or take a pill that changes our eye color.
I SEE WHAT YOU DID THERE   Thank you xD 
 Sorry, but I had to remove your recent post on /r/Snapchat because your title did not comply with our official guidelines. You can check out the guidelines [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/snapchat/comments/1saxrg/must_read_how_to_format_your_post/).  This is the proper way to format a title -&gt; *AGE [R4R] - DESCRIPTION*  Here is a TL;DR checklist of what should be in your header:  **1. Use only M, F, T, A, and R for tagging gender.**  **2. Use [] around the R4R tag, so it looks like [R4R]. Don't use (), {}, or anything else.**  **3. For multiple ages or letter tags, only use /'s, so it looks like 21/21 [MF4R]. Don't use . , \\ | - : ; ~ or anything else.**  **4. Your age must be included before your [R4R].**  **5. If you are posting about /r/Snapchat in general, please use a [meta] tag at the beginning of the subject.**  Please visit [the submission page](http://www.reddit.com/r/Snapchat/submit?sidebar&amp;title=AGE [R4R] - TITLE) to resubmit your post. If you get an error message asking you to wait, you must wait until the timer expires before posting again.  If you're still having issues with your post, please feel free to [message the moderators](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FSnapChat).   Thanks! :D  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/snapchat) if you have any questions or concerns.*
It's most likely in the shaft the most, either flex or length, mess around with both at golf smith
Capitalists are coerced by the laws of competition. Creating surplus value (or profit for the sake of simplicity) is not a choice, it is "Moses and the Prophets", as in a religious obligation. If you fail to accumulate as much as your competitors, your company will go bust. You constantly have to accumulate more and expand because of the threat of your competitors. Even capitalists have no freedom in bourgeois society.
You said it! What goes around comes around. 
PSN being offline doesn't lock digital games, does it? 
Delurking after about a month. I'm trying for an outline plus 1,000 words.  Yes, I know I'm half-assing it.  Yes, I know I'm doing it wrong.  Yes, I'm often bad at following directions.  Because I'm still firmly in the "let's do this to offset the cost of my KU subscription" and "I'm off to write the sexy stuff I wanted to find and yet couldn't" camp, I'm not bothered... yet.  (Incidentally, "brat" means something very specific in BDSM.  It means something *completely different* on Amazon. *That* was a learning curve, letmetellyou.)  In real life, I'm an analyst. I really like programming and analysis, and I really hate sexist assholes.  Your dataporn tag is as catnip to me.
Death to the reds!
BIFF [](#minglee)
Very similar situation for myself. Lesson learned.
Love The House You're In by Moonface
Dallas Buyers Clubridge Too Fargoh, Gods of **(The) Egyptian**
How can people still be in denial about this? I don't get it. You cant deny so much of our sea life dying in record numbers, stronger storms, extreme drought and extreme heat....
Would like to know this too. Only reason why I'm not using it now..
[Maybe this is the solution.](http://www.bbc.com/news/magazine-17474967)  Just kidding, it's not the solution. Still pretty funny though.  "The face must be visible and the photos must show you as the passive partner"
Yep, Vehicle repossession technology in 2944 is something ain't it?   Make your payments on time people ;) 
If you adjust for pace, the sixers are better than the warriors.   \#facts
Height doesn't matter at all. I'm 5'10 and is hope no one really cares about that stuff 
Not to be confused with Empire State of Mind
Everyone I know just bullshits
I'm going to have to wait until November to vote Trump :(.  Jelly of everybody who gets to vote Trump twice.
314 warlock Bignickribeiro
I love all the EYE-OH-EYE-OH-EYE got me feelin drunk and high.  I love how the bass line flows up and down during the chorus.
Politics aside, that dude said what the entire country needed to hear.
Time - Pink Floyd for Psychedelic Rock. Or since the entire album is basically one long lasting, bone chillingly incredible song, Dark Side of the Moon - Pink Floyd for Psychedelic Rock. 
I always questioned that, but used him for pretty much the same reason. Sounds better.
Books lie upon the shelves, lining the walls with their bodies.  I have heard their stories.  They stand before me, backs to me.  A name is all they give. Some hide that.  I touch them, hold them, listen to their whispers upon my bed.  Others have known them, felt them, owned them, but put them aside.  Marred and smudged, wrinkled and battered, they came to me.  I take them from obscurity and the blank pages of forgotten words, and  place these books upon my shelves, lining the walls with their bodies.  I have heard their stories.
[Chitoge was actually in Gintama though](http://i.imgur.com/IZg2O6c.png)  edit: better picture
Lord no
Tbqphwyf = to be quite perfectly honest with you fam?
Completely agree with you. I deal with it on a weekly basis. Some obvious, some subtle. And I live in an extremely Multicultural city 
This needs to be a scene in Steven Universe
What does the L mean? or just a flub?
Open to offers
The panels with the LEDs are PCBs. They're going to shatter like that on impact.
Trump wont, as he won't release his tax returns. He has dirt and it only benefits him to keep it hidden. What I don't get is why the New York Times doesn't "leak" it. I bet they're saving it for after Trump clinches the nomination.  Trump's big mouth knows no bounds. Pretty stupid to say that in front of the NYT editorial board if it is true.
Sure!
Timothy by The Tallest Man on Earth. It's just too good
Good luck.  I was on the speech &amp; debate team when I was your age and when I look back on my education I think it was one of the most useful skills I was taught. Less the public speaking part and more the critical thinking. It really teaches you how to think, in a way.  Personally, I'm for Clinton but I wish you the best, young grasshopper.
Do i measure the midsole? LOL cause it came out to 32 and a half CM.
Why are you trying so hard? I like John Oliver's show but the whole 'Drumpf' attack is extremely childish and forced.
People would ask question like this.  There is no "worst" just a bunch of good and bad.   But if I had to choose "PCMASTERACE" can be annoying as fak. 
No shit, eh? It's a waste of time also. Just a way to draw more money out of students ... quite a shame actually, as the American system used to be quite good. Also, the lack of Habilitation is kind of ridiculous.
Unlimited wet food, and I have to constantly use the laser pointer to entertain them.  
Thanks!  Edited my post to show  meal info
Let's be clear here: This video depicts someone pushing a secret service agent and getting choked.   Pushing secret service = choked. 
You're probably better off not having them teach you then. Like really. Driver's ed man isn't going to grab the steering wheel, jerk you off the road, and scream that it's your fault the car ran off the road and she was just grabbing the wheel to keep us from going off the cliff. Wouldn't have gone off the road at all if she hadn't grabbed it... Scary stuff happens when they think they're helping you.   I think you'll do fine in your class. :) I'm glad you're getting the opportunity to take it. You can go to the DMV and they'll give you a free book of all the meanings of the road signs and stuff too. I wish you luck! 
we should host a FFRk fanart hall of fame. this should be in it. 
lol glad i clicked
He's throwing rocks at the fence.
My favorite thing about youtube red is that it continues to play once i turn off my screen or switch to another window.
Lol you're following me around into different subs. That's harrassment
Yet simultaneously, so sensitive.
Say what you will about his rapping, Juice is the most fashionable out of the 3
Sounds good! I'll send you a message with photo of the cards / mailing address &amp; if you could do the same, it would be appreciated. I can ship tomorrow if all is well.
http://www.audioclouds.net/index.php?a=track&amp;id=286
*one monster gets hit, the remaining 8 rush him.*  Awesome will never save your life! Precision will! Patience and courage will. And most of all, focus! 30 seconds left!
The parade would be spectacular with all the Seahawks jerseys.
This is my favorite post ever on this subreddit.
-8887
This post was removed because you have a new account and we get a lot of spam from newly created accounts. If you have any questions or think your post should be reinstated, please send a message to the mods. Be sure to include a link to the post in question!  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/blackdesertonline) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I actually feel that organic takes something away from Peter. Having him make the shooters helps reinforce that the kid is brilliant and having organic sort of makes it a lot harder for him to ever have a "normal life". I'd really love for Peter to have a chance at that once his days of being Spidey in the MCU are over (honestly I would love for him to get depowered and then become a background/side character after Miles takes over as Spidey).
We said that about Quinn and look where we are.
I see this terminology all the time in Asian restaurants. It's not some colloqualism. It's in very common usage. I appreciate you supplying sources though!
"Right... yah." He laughed a little, scratching the back of his head. "Alcohol? Got some things I should catch you up on."
If we're going off on current market price, E30 M3. I love the car and would love to own one, but I just can't justify spending $25k for a decent example
Here's a very rudimentary example.  http://i.imgur.com/bJPcPcl.jpg  Notice the recording server has two separate connections -- one to the home network and one to the camera network. Each connection has its own IP configuration as well. Does this help?
This incident was dramatized in an episode of the very good HBO miniseries "From the Earth to the Moon".  Buzz Aldrin taking Communion on the lunar surface was my favorite, but this was a close second.
Thanks. Really thanks! Yesterday I even tried geckoview, but was not happy with size and had some problem with landscape. Purpose of app is to always have access to  password card or ability to generate one without internet access. Also, I think its actually only one actual open-source PasswordCard application for android, and it can be run locally in mostly any (well, now again) desktop browser phone. I found also that passcards can be well used with old people, since its always easier to remember some figure on paper then password from generator.
Eh, fair enough.  &gt;Do I think the mods should be cracking down on stupid posts like this one? Yes.  This part makes me laugh a little because this post hasn't been reported once. Just a bunch of *edgy* comments.  We have two mods on /r/Portland who aren't assisting us with this sub right now. And I had been leaving this sub alone for the last few months assuming someone else had been trying to curate the content here.  I agree that this low-effort content shouldn't be allowed, but I don't know what to do to address that in the meantime since I didn't even see this post until almost two days later when someone reported your comment. And on the other hand, I think this post did spark a meaningful comment from one user in here, and I commend him for not going full snark-hole on OP.  Anyway, I guess it's a good time to bring this topic up again.
I'm not sure that 'not involved in the conflict' is quite accurate here.
Where'd you hear that? Last I heard we were just about the only people *not* doing that, and I've got [this](http://www.sbs.com.au/news/article/2015/12/18/australian-special-forces-help-free-ramadi|) and [this](https://www.funker530.com/australia-plays-huge-role-in-retaking-of-ramadi/) saying so. Couldn't find a millimetre of evidence retracting those statements, either; and it'd be consistent with stated government policy.
See you in a few years when the Warrios go back to becoming an imcompetent organization and you hop off that bandwagon.
More SZA and Rashad, less Ab-Soul.
thanks, good to know
They can't really come along, no, though I've been trying to impress on them how long many of my dogs go out for--some of the tiny toy dogs, like Yorkies, shih tzus, Havanese, maltipoos, etc. get signed up for 1-3 hours every day with me, and it's honestly still not really enough, I just don't have time to do more. A husky would need something way more intense; back when I was exercising almost exclusively large dogs, I was eating like 4000 calories a day and still dropping weight like crazy because I wouldn't be walking casually everywhere like I am now, I'd be running with the dogs all day. The fiance actually used to be athletic, so I suggested maybe he get back into running in the mornings with the potential husky, but he didn't seem to think that was necessary.
You'd have more appeal with this explanation if #3 wasn't worded with such bias. Your verbiage assumes the youth vote is always democratic and describe your example of a 51/49 minority split as just enough "country" vote.  This is all good information, but #3 comes off as "republicans abusing gerrymandering to stifle youth democratic votes". It happens on both sides and is undesirable and dirty across the board.  (Spoken as an undeclared and unaligned 2016 Bernie Sanders supporter in a known Republican state)
I did. We've been living together for years, this is just the first year I thought to ask and I haven't been working. Thanks!
886016
Hmm, weird. Everything I read about him says that his passing game has been unbelievable, and that he's having a good season. But I'll take it from you I suppose. 
yeah, I'm calling shenanigans here. at the very least no employer with half a brain is going to tell someone what disciplinary actions were taken or what conversations were had with the employee. If this is true the school district opened itself up to a massive lawsuit. 
It took so long the first time I looked away at the wrong time and missed it. Sat through it a second time and felt cheated
Fucking Glen climbing under the dumpster instead of being eaten on walking dead. There's no fucking way that was going to happen
hehehe, I wasn't expecting that. :)  I had a canned response ready to go, about how "no, you can't wait on the fifth of a tile if the other four are in your hand, etc etc." and then I saw it. Well done.
Do you really think that's safe?
that's exactly what he means 
that's what he was saying, dillweed 
thats the plan I guess. :) 
Hi there! Your post was removed because it uses the text box. Per [rule 1](/r/AskReddit/wiki/index#wiki_-rule_1-), use of the text box is prohibited. You can resubmit your post [here](/r/askreddit/submit?selftext=true&amp;title=Attention, class clowns! What are some characteristics of your favourite or most effective teachers?) without the textbox.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/AskReddit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Tucking in my shirt. 
Don't longboard. I've skated street for the past 13 years. Argued to allow kids to skate kids to skate to school, worked to get a skatepark in my county, and prevented a ban on skateboards on and traveling to school premises. Also, raised money to get kids skate locks outside their school.  Just because I don't subscribe to the destructive "Fuck the World" mantra you seem to think skating is all about, does not make me a non-skater "longboarder". I've been more a part of skateboarding and its community than you have.  And who do you think owns a business? Do you think it's not run by a person?  And he charged up for that shoulder throw. Doubt it was his intention to do it before the trick, but after the land he could have easily avoided breaking that.
Well shit, now I'll have to at least check the pilot out--but then, the only take on Archie I've seemed to like are stuff like Afterlife with Archie, so maybe I'm not part of Archie's target audience.
Oof, that 12.5% ratio man, and with HA...it's rough. I wish you luck in your endeavors haha  And thank you--I'll be using this game more to farm events this year (shhhh), but I'm wondering if it's alright if I put up temporary/short-lived TSV threads while I'm SRing and such. I'll probably ask first before I do anything =)
  *Last checked: 04:57PM EST-0500*
What I love about this movie is that there's a part where a patient at the asylum tells the main character the exact nature of the twist at the end. But you don't pick up on it, which is sort of a way of saying that crazy people talk and nobody listens 
net says 1240 for Zanesville! 
oh, you mean like 90% of the rest of the bullshit he says  Or how he looked like a complete idiot talking about how none of those immigrants werent terrorists... then 2 weeks later gunned down 120 frenchmen for Allah??  CURRENT YEAR!
Everyone in my house is extroverted EXCEPT me. Even my freaking dog is an extrovert.   My main coping strategy is preschool. Even though I work from home and could technically manage without the childcare help, preschool gives them social interaction every day that I don't have to be a part of.   Another strategy is library events. This afternoon was Lego Club. We went, my kids built things and talked to other kids, while I read my book in a corner. Everybody wins.
maybe if he literally couldn't reach a low and away pitch if he tried he won't swing at the sliders that are really low and away
I'll wake up around 5+pm (your time, CST) and be on until 8pm (when I have to head out to school).
That's 2pm UK time tomorrow
The mods feelings aren't more important than competitive cod. It's in our subreddit's and dexerto's best interest to makeup and proceed with caution. I get they broke the rules but I also see a lot of shit posts from certain users on topics that have been discussed numerous times just so they can post their own YouTube video later without breaking the 3:1 rule. A lifetime ban absurd. I think you should give them a timeframe of the bans length instead of "whenever the mods feel like it"
Interesting. Can you see a Jill Stein surge happening, as far as reddit goes?
Jerid has a quest for vengeance now, because unlike Kamille he remembers people he cares about after they die. (Cough, Kamille's family, cough)  &gt; And we still don't have a name for Mysterious Mobile Armour Guy.  His name is Jonathan Love, and his Vegas name is Spider.
I love linear games. Uncharted was exemplary in no category.
it's so picturesque isn't it!? Ah down in Naples, nice! I didn't go south of Rome myself but I definitely will if/when I go back :)
Ouch dude. I'm a size 13/12.5 so I've got a few more options.
This is the real "Ginny". Yes I made the video private because the comments got really out of control and I coudn't handle reading them anymore, good, or bad. Of course I wasn't going to completely elaborate on my situation.  I have my mic, my laptop, etc even though I am homeless (which people dont seem to agree on because clearly im in a motel in the video.) There was nothing fake or an act about this. I am an incredibly introverted and reclusive person and I only ever had good intentions with my ASMR channel. I feel alot of the way i am conveyed is because I used to be a camgirl also, because they are seen as money seeking whores. I refuse to sell my things unless I was desperate to pawn it. I've had to sell things before only to end up feeling like shit. I started crying before I even started to press record and just tried to breathe and take long pauses in the video to control what I was trying to convey. Before this motel I was staying with a very controlling ex boyfriend and I slept on his fucking floor. No one will fully know my life story and thats fine. As I mentioned in the video, yes I used to be a camgirl and yes it did fuck up my life. I dont have family support and I have 1 real friend whos helping me, best to their abilities. People had asked me if i was on some type of income assistance and i have been and its not enough to live on. Before I made this video, the day before i tried making a "normal" ASMR video with my props but felt too stressed, not all there. I cant make people relaxed and happy if im not, simple as that. 
There's walking into spawn and bouncing back, on par with B-stepping, and then there's shouting across the stage at your defeated opponents.  One seems slightly worse to me.
it's a mod called "total war"
OP didn't do anything wrong - most of the comments acknowledge that. People change their minds. That's life.  What OP doesn't get, though, is to have his cake and eat it, too. When you change your mind about kids and your partner doesn't, you split up. That's also life. 
OoooOOOOOooh
Yeah. It's gonna be a long, hard grind for EXP. I'd recommend going to Netflix/Hulu, booting up a series, and binge while you mindlessly run in at the Elite 4 and get your ass kicked. You'll need something to keep your mind occupied while you train.
I'm surprised that person didn't drop unconscious. 
You couldn't find a less photogenic man.
Bovada sucks in everyone's opinion. Change books for sure. 
That's just lazy trolling.
He also has some sweet skull wellies on that you can see when he exits the factory.
And Muse
Okay, so I don't particularly have to worry about "bad" units?
Matt does that a lot. Poses things as probable that really should be described as possible. 
Not sure that was SpunJ m8, I think it was someone from immunity or something.
Nothing. That's the problem. Unfounded work anxiety. The turnover rate is so high because it's along the lines of sales.. having to hit certain metrics, etc. So dead weight is cut pretty regularly, often uncomfortably early.
how do you know were your order is in the shipping order?
I bet the fucker bought all the train stations to make his way up to piss agent 007.
I jumped off the Bernie ship a month ago but I agree.
I am very good at failing at everything I do.
Looks like I found the life of the party.  I am an EMT and I've also witnessed the birth of my own son so I have been through the experience with my own eyes.  I understand you have your own opinion on the matter but even after seeing childbirth with my own eyes including the details you mentioned,  I think my opinion will stay right where it is.  
&gt; I'm curious what counterarguments the city will raise.  What's the Latin for "You're all soulless assholes and you've forfeited the right to a fair trial"?
This is worse than anything done by Tudor, Cromwell or Trevelyan. Genocide is one thing, this is a whole other level
spring time, when the short shorts start parading around campus. then also again in the fall when the yoga pants start their migration.
I wish somebody would do me with a novelty account. Do me real good like.
Frequency doesn't drop much because of temps, it often is because the card reached its power limit (110% for our card).  Keep an eye on the power limit in MSI afterburner 
The wake is a pretty cool Richmond tradition. 
I'm not sure. In my experience, using two hands makes it easier to kick higher.
Yes your meaning is much easier to grasp once you've refined it and ignored you're previous replies. You most likely couldn't tell the difference between a cheap Seiko 5y23 and one of the high end GS Quartz movements yet there are quite a few differences between them. And since your original post had to do with some cheap Korean homage movement the time keeping will be even further apart from something like a basic Quartz.   Even a top grade mechanical can barely match an average Quartz so if your industry or job requires down to the second time keeping you're not going to choose a Seiko 5. The difference in time keeping might seem minor to someone not in the know but seconds make all the difference in the watch world.  Even though I have other means of timekeeping my watch is still my go to source.
You're well suited to both subs. ;)
What for?  Might aswell give Dota 1 etc "legends" their own autographs in Dota right?  Seriously though, no.
Rental RW, but able to dump him through scratching. Not bad. 
Wait what?
I definitely encourage this! Have you before?
I wish I was the person who thought of this.
Paul McCartney. Live and let die ground shaking explosions.
You didn't cheat on her dude. She broke up with you.  I know that won't help you much as far as how to be honest with her, but for your own sanity you need to remember that you did nothing wrong, it's just unfortunate that she would break up with you if that's not actually what she wanted.
Okay sweet thank you!
This is getting easier and easier with EPC Gen2 compliant RFID tags.  You can store all the info you need (pricing, shelf location, weight, etc) on one chip that costs pennies and the size of a grain of rice. There are some major stores starting to universally tag their inventory: IIRC, Walmart and Home Depot are on that list
The show needs more Grandpa Schnabel!
forced meme
So you'd be a pussy god, huh? Haha just kidding. I know what you mean.
Gorgeous.  Mind if I ask what you paid for something like that? 
yep, same thing for all psychic casters including the Psi-blade magus and the psychic bloodline sorcerer.
Basically everyone involved in the team gets a ring. Even our casters got rings, I wouldn't be shocked if the equipment manager and medical team get them as well.
Thanks! I better be careful now though with downvotes accessed easily... 
Don't wait 5 minutes. Just go enter the opposite base. Bosses will auto spawn. 
Well first the assumption I got based off of your original post is that Trump will not be the president. For simplicity sake, I assumed Trump would win the Republican nomination since he looks like he is going to.   On the predictwise website, if you scroll down a little, you can go to presidential match up. I do not understand why they had Democrats at 64% and then Republicans at 36%, because if you clicked on the presidential matchup. It showed you the odds of a democrat winning every state plus the district of Columbia. If the fundamental probability was 100% than their was practically no way that the Republicans would win that state (e.g. California, Massachusetts, etc.) Conversely, if the probability was 0% than their is practically no way the democrats will win it (e.g. Texas, Mississippi, etc...). At the far right of the column, it has the electoral votes each state has. So I compared the states that were greater than 50% (those that the democrats are favored to win based on this website) versus those less than 50% (Republicans favored). The results were that the Republicans were favored to win more electoral votes. Therefore, the Republican candidate should be favored... 
Thanks, And thanks for the advice and stuff :)
Yeah that applies to almost everything?
What's the humidifier do? I don't know anything about them   Edit: from the weather when it's humid that means there's a lot of water in the air. Why would you want the air inside your house more humid?
20 bucks is like a whole pizza with toppings on it. That's more than enough to be excited for. 
[John Oliver disagrees and has some excellent points.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=DnpO_RTSNmQ)
I definitely want honesty, so I appreciate it.  And you bring up lots of good points, like what if an emergency happens?  Yeah I probably need more savings.  This is exactly why I am posting, to hear things I haven't thought of from people on the scene!  But I've seen ads in Sugarhouse, like two bedroom for $775 or something around there, and there are others here who think that with roommates, &lt;$450 is very doable - far from impossible.  And I've seen multiple, frequent postings for call center positions at $15/hr through Adecco, so not sure where you're coming from saying I'd only get $10-11.   I'm moving for the climbing, skiing, and other outdoors activities.  It's all soooooo close by!  And soooo good!  They are truly passions of mine.  I've been skiing once this season and it's driving me nuts.  Thank you for typing out such a well thought out response.  I'd also be interested to hear what you have to say about the evidence I have that counters some of your points.  Is that all bullshit too?  Not being sarcastic at all, I wholly admit I do not know enough to be making this decision any time soon.
Losing an addiction is the hardest thing imaginable. I've been adding them on over the years and I can't imagine life without even one of them subtracted.
For my bachelor party, I had my five best friends over and we ate pizza, drank Mtn. Dew and beer, and played a marathon session of D&amp;D.  Was pretty great.
I accuse people who wear cotton clothing of racism, because the slaves picked cotton.  I accuse books of racism for describing history.  I accuse people who read books about history of racism because racism.  I racism people who racism because racism.  I racism racism racism.
I think there are better ways to masturbate than repeatedly posting here.   And, more importantly, we'll all feel better.
Assuming she exists, which seems unlikely, why can't she ask "her" own questions?   And this has nothing to do with C++.
Which Calculus are you taking? Try discussing this with the teacher. Go to office hours. Use sites such as Wolfram Alpha and Khan Academy. I actually got a D the first time I took Calc. Those two sites helped me immensely the second go around. Go to the free tutoring on campus by other students. Also, you need to go take advantage of Counseling and Psychological Services on campus. You are paying a lot of money to go to school, try to use every resource available to you.   You can also post on your school's FB page, Craigslist, etc. for help with Calc. An upperclassman Eng major can help you in return for money, or a swipe/food credit at the cafeteria. You'd be surprised. If there is a community college nearby, go sit in on one of their classes or go to one of their tutorings.   Another thing you can do is delete or suspend your Civilizations acct. And if you pay for premium cancel or suspend it. Also, give yourself some time to play, 1 day a week. 
Just because the file isn't .wmv, doesn't mean it's not a fake. Thats just one of the signs and even then you're still looking at the user that uploaded the torrent.  Things that can help you figure it out is look at the users other uploads, are there quite a few unrealistic ones that could possibly not be out? Like movies not out or episodes that haven't aired. How long has the person been adding these torrents? If its only the last few days, that is a warning sign in itself. Also, is the user trusted? Check by seeing if they have one of the trusted user skulls by their username.   Always read the comments too
Yep, I adopted both my cats from the [MSPCA in JP](https://www.mspca.org/adoption-centers/boston-adoption-center/), it's a good facility. They were also the ones who had that [gigantic cat](https://www.petfinder.com/petdetail/28165153) a while back.
#[Refused -- The Shape of Punk to Come.](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Shape_of_Punk_to_Come)  #[Interpol -- Turn on the Bright Lights.](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Turn_on_the_Bright_Lights)
Because he was wrong.
Já vi muito engenheiro: "Tem que asfaltar tudo mermo!" "Que, planejamento, o que?!"   É tipo isso mesmo. Ninguém tá nem aí. 
My Birth.
Not everyone on a SD site is either a predatory scumbag or a damsel with daddy issues in distress. Don't just up and assume that people fit the mold of whatever you judge them to be. There are plenty of decent people out there and signing up is a personal choice. I say this as someone who uses a similar website myself- this is absolutely none of your business. She's a legal adult and it's her life. It's none of your business who she talks to, who she sleeps with and whether or not she goes to church. If you tell her family you would effectively be outing her and throwing her under a bus.
to prove that you really cant teach an old dog new tricks?
With 8 I would basically spawn and die.
How many famous men have He-man's body? How many famous women have Barbie's figure? Men have a lot broader masculine ideals than women have in my opinion. 
[Exterminatus](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=NNc242mbiUs)
https://www.reddit.com/r/GlobalOffensiveTrade/comments/48bzle/store1_of_2_st_m4a1s_cyrex_with_2x_ibuypower/  feel free to check out my store, it has some really rare and nice shit in it (:
I don't mind really.  I don't like feeling like I have to pretend to be something I am not.  However, when you socialize it's nothing but pretending to be someone you aren't. I pretend to be reasonably competent at work, and that I always know what I am doing.  Strangers, I am always pretending to be fine and ok.  It just depends. Sometimes it is relaxing to just fall into a known role and not have to be yourself for a bit.
I got my 2:1. I'm good with keeping jimmy out of my collection for a few more days.
While I do think it got a bit out of hand, there IS a bias there. You named examples and totally ignored the fact why they're biased. I do agree with the point about #1, but lets look at #2.   &gt;Yes, the teaser for this game should have included more footage about CLG. With that said, trying to argue that CLG has some kind of story line going that even come close to rivaling what Riot can talk about C9 is insane.  There's plenty of storyline to tell. You can talk about the former NA champs wanting to climb back up to the top, or atleast have them talk about the specific match. It's not like they're only working on C9 material, just throw in more CLG stuff.   And as for #3  &gt;Unlike what OP claimed, we have seen interviews with the losing team before, and we have seen interviews with both losing and winning teams before. They are rare but that's common sense. Losing teams aren't usually up for interviews. Seeing both perspectives of the game is awesome I don't know why you'd be against it. Maybe they shouldn't have cut off Aphro's time or they could have made the transition smoother but that's on the production team. Claiming that this is a result of "bias" though is once again far-fetched at best.  IT'S NOT ABOUT WHO GOT AN INTERVIEW. You shouldn't cut off someone because you think that 'Hai's perspective is more important' or whatever reasoning you can think of. You want to end the interview early? Do it properly. Don't defend Riot's mistakes. They're a great company, but things like this need attention or they'll continue for a long time.
He has so many obligations he cannot spend too much time in one place. Yuge day tomorrow
nice explanation of why you don't like it. very detailed.
Cogito Ergo
Snapdragon clone.
Ever since the tragic events of 7/11.
Heh hmmmm so the thought was that it was draining you of energy andor power by projecting dread into your body so that it could then *feast*/ what do you perceive it's intent to be as you are in a space of understanding and love for the entity and its role in aiding your understanding.  The two minor entities trying to drag your mind out--in an attempt to engage with you more fully perhaps?
I was expecting like a $1 or $2 auth type thing but i guess they just attempt to pay near the shipping time
r/loseit
Grime at room 2 in fabric the other day had some really odd MC's some were great but some were just nah walked back into room 1.
He's good in the meta, but he's also so high impact that even in the stun meta he saw a decent amount of competitive play. A good Zeratul player will win most of his games as Zeratul unless the team throws hard.
I have noticed that men from the middle east and south Asia where I work also crossing their legs like that.  I think it's a very North American kind of thing to take up an insane amount of space with your legs, as if your balls are the size of cantaloupes and anything so much as grazing them, even your own legs, will cause some sort of excruciating pain.
You're right lol but I think it was so good at being political which is big in music right now
Comes back with this: 8147 MISTY RIDGE LN HOUSTON TX 77071-2909
I opened that link and all I felt was laughter, but then I realized I was laughing at this poor man's corpse.  I kept laughing.
I feel like everyone is trying to argue my comment by poking holes in religion as a whole.  You are failing at looking at the situation from a religious persons standpoint.
&gt; all business is expressly forbidden   You have no idea what kind of shit storm this would produce. 
Umm, what?  Are you saying you think anyone should be allowed to beat up and run from the police, and then get off scott-free for it?  The entire concept of something being a crime is to prevent people from doing it.  We don't want people to do those things, so the law says you can get punished for it.
Wut???
sure.
Y'know, when Reddit tells me that a link has been posted, I don't post, instead of trying to find a work-around.
I love what Barthes said about Billy Graham's preaching: *if God is really speaking through Dr. Graham, then you've got to admit that God is stupid: the Message is shockingly platitudinous and infantile... a steady stream of fragmented affirmations without any internal logic, devoid of any content besides the tautological ("God is God").*  (Apologies for my rough translation from [the French](http://monoskop.org/images/9/9b/Barthes_Roland_Mythologies_1957.pdf).)  Certainly applies to the modern sermon too, doesn't it?
Yep, this is just warning from me, because lots of us commuting! 
If you  have a tiny (or even if it's not...) disposable income, why not try the library?
**HD Stream** [Philadelphia 76ers @ Washington Wizards](http://www.nbastream.net/philadelphia-76ers-at-washington-wizards-live-stream.html) 3500 kbps,60 fps , mobile compatible , similar to Youtube  *** Streamup may still have issues, if the video will lag please change to the SD stream! ( the SD player is not mobile compatible )   If anybody wants to help with a small donation, here's the link : https://imraising.tv/u/cflorin23 Thanks!  Bitcoin : 1HaF6pzhrbE7wMzfuQAGdBEemSWbkPQ2tF  The video will be changed soon to game feed
Metamorphosis.
Warrior &amp; Paladin. Takes a whole mob to kill a buffed one and both classes have great utility. I mostly favor WAR due to the HP utility you have and burst potential.
Nah, it's not though. It's relevant because you said it has negative health benefits, and that's why it should be illegal. And I gave two examples of things that are much worse for health and yet are still legal.   You claiming it was a strawman is in and of itself a strawman. 
[Streamable Mirror](https://streamable.com/tyee)   ****   ^I ^am ^a ^bot. ^[FAQ](https://www.reddit.com/r/XboxBot/wiki/faq)
Ahhhh South Carolina. I love it here though. 
Well shucks, maybe one day
I'm thinking about it, but I'm not sure I could write something comprehensive.  A lot of them its just spidey sense at this point.  I know what to do when I'm fighting them moment by moment, but I couldn't tell you why or how I know.  I couldn't even remember half their names most of the time.  It's just "the arcane guy with adds that you try to stay to the left of as he floats around" or "the one that splits into copies of himself and shoots lasers who will never hit you if you keep running clockwise circles while darting in and out a little."  My best advice honestly would be:  Put on really crappy gear with a lot of damage reduction, unspend all your paragon that add damage, clear a tx rift, and then dismiss your pets and dance with the rift guardian for 10 minutes.  See what keeps you from getting hit.  They hit a lot harder in grifts, but the mechanics are identical.  If you want it to be a little more comparable to what its like with pets, give your templar a badly rolled intellect thunderfury with the weapon damage rolled off, along with can not die token and a wydward with damaging stats rolled into resource costs/empty sockets.  Then you'll have a pet who doing slightly more damage than your none, trying to keep his attention and randomly stunning.
I prove my existence to them. That'll show 'em.
"that's not him"? Imdb says he was in both, was he someone else and someone that looked like him was also there? Idk which'd be more interesting
普通の× 紙の本も何冊か出とるやんけ…
Android Police primarily. Sometimes I check Android Authority and Android Central. Phone Arena and Pocketnow are my go to's for general phone news, though I primarily read Android related articles 
Seriously, this makes me just feel like this is becoming a straw man. 
full circle! sanku!  Now I see where [Die Antwoord](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uMK0prafzw0&amp;t=1m10s) got that catchy beat yo! Talk about owning it.
He was corki and he hardly did more damage than syndra who actually blew people up making it a 4 v 5. Also poke damage is not a good measurement of effective damage especially when the enemy has an alistar who probably shaved off 30% of all poke he landed with his heal.   I mean sven had more damage that game and he was graves who applies a ton more burst damage also blowing people up. Also corki had 1.8k physical damage and 12.2k magical. 1.8/14 = 12.9% physical damage. I mean ideally you see a 25/75 ratio on type of damage but DL had a 13/87 split which shows how unaffective he was in an actual teamfight. So he basically didn't do much other than poke with rockets which ali healed up and got binded by lux until he had to recall.   EDIT: here's the damage spread:  hauntz = 9.6k  Sven = 14.4k  Bjerg =13k  DL = 14k  YS = 3.1k  So technically dealing 25% of his teams damage.  But honestly closer to 20% in effective damage most likely seeing how he hardly autoed anyone.
Was this just a regular public school teacher? 
Taiwan stakes a claim to the mainland, their whole existance is about who owns 'China' - this allows the PRC to pretend Taiwan is a renegade province that can be dealt with.  This is why Taiwan hasnt claimed independance and why no countries recognise it's existance, because to recognise it you need to go along with the fact that they are the rightful rulers of China as a whole.  To declare independance would be losing the right to that claim, but the PRC can't have that as it will cause instability.
&gt; slavery seems to be something we pretend ended  That's because in the US it did... You can't spin this any other way. You can talk about wage and class slavery all you want, but at the end of the day, ball and chain slavery does not exist here. And if you are conflating the former with the latter, you'd be making a disingenuous argument.
Poor bastard. The only one of the four who never got to solid NHLer level. I think he's the youngest, too...
How did you get there when it was so empty?   Not even LDO shoppers.
Its a very complicated process, usually filtration and purification takes up as much room as the generation and combustion areas of the energy from waste plants. 
I mean, I don't really give a damn who anyone on the planet is fucking. This is some pathetic bored housewife shit.
Which storyline are you referring to? 
[GIFV link](https://i.imgur.com/uQdK9LS.gifv) // [FAQ](https://www.reddit.com/r/livven/wiki/gifv-bot)
Unless you live in California, in which case you should probably just resign yourself to tepid sponge baths forevermore.
Afraid not, sorry. I traded any doubles I had for ones I didn't, sadly these are the only 3 I have available at the moment.
yeah i can imagine it must be hard to fit all the info in that you wanna give. Good effort none the less!
I highly recommend it if you want to take your production to the next level!! bunch of awesome dudes 
Transported 35 years into the future a 14 year old Japanese girl is getting use to this new weird country.  *I can't believe the future's this moe!*
Are you guys no contact? What led to the breakup?
youre like a food chemist!!
I think that would be motive enough to stop the hiring of illegals. A higher up can't compel you to break the law and you can get much richer than $100k by suing them for attempting to do that.
If you call their support and explain to them what happened, they may or may not help you. Also what store did you go to? If you explain to them calmly what happened, they may be able to help you. When I lived in the EU, there was no eshop so someone else may be able to provide a better answer.
Anberlin - (*fin)  '2000s Warped Tour rock' genre
Any of the recent Avengers movies from the Netflix Jessica Jones' POV.  
Rocket fuel tanks came out of pods correct?
If its a 2v3 or a 1v3  The dead teammate(s) should be calling out WHERE people are and not WHAT they are(i.e 1 shot, full health, that death was bs etc) And then its up to u(and ur teammate if he is still alive) to talk it out and figure out what they should do.  I do, very rarely tho, tell what my team should do when im dead. I only do it if im 99% sure that it will work out to our favor.  Whenever my clanmates play with me that is what i do and they trust me.  I once made my clanmate switch to invis nades during a 1v3 clutch round when it was 4-4. And guess what? It worked and the rest of the round was done in the next 5 seconds
Fuck it, give me Ken's face.
HAHA! No problem man! I just wanted to make sure people understood what you were saying because your post will be very valuable to some, I'm sure of it! Anything that helps the Requiem community play as bug free as possible is a good thing for everyone!
/uj This game is actually worth the $20 if you want to support new ideas instead of rehashing old ones. The story is on par with Talos and while it is short, the challenges after you beat it add a lot of replayability. 20 hours worth? No, but probably a good 10-15 depending on how good you are at the game.
Those cops are laughing made me laugh. Everyone knows what's up
I see, my condolences.  Also, she's cute!
Or Hitchcock.
You. I like you.
It's funny. Something Jesse said to me when I got to meet him at PAX South totally makes sense now.   I was at his impromptu meet and greet session on Sunday. He asked about something I had made with a 3D printer and commented he wished he could get one. I just haphazardly said something like "Oh I'm sure you could get/afford one" and his response was "maybe not for much longer" (paraphrase).  This must be what he was talking about. 
"It's wrong but I won't say anymore besides repeating that it's wrong"
if you guys focus hard enough in the right corner ish they is an eye of some sort 
[Emiya Kiritsugu](http://i.imgur.com/5M8ajny.gifv)  [Ryougi Shiki](https://secure.static.tumblr.com/5b5c989c3649fe96c36cbf306768163d/r55g6us/ifVnmal4b/tumblr_static_tumblr_static_4mit5pfm4lyc48owwsw8wws8w_640.gif)  [Joesph Joestar](http://6.blog.xuite.net/6/1/2/5/22451800/blog_1858546/txt/65254009/148.gif)  [Okazaki Tomoya](http://49.media.tumblr.com/173560ad0df1bc9d4d68b67c81ea30b1/tumblr_nm0xfd6Qrr1qm5zwho4_400.gif)   [Motoko Kusangai](https://media.giphy.com/media/ZEdvKr2kT6qMU/giphy.gif)
Visiting LA, where I've seen more Model S's today than I've seen back home in Ohio throughout Model S's existence. An X is close though. I can feel it.
NICO PURI HATES ME. 
Deadline is midnight...but is that midnight EST? I'm in PST and I won't even get to my computer until at least 9pm (midnight EST)
[I am sorry for his feet...](http://imgur.com/Nq5chHh)
Go ask marlon and Dorie. 
You are a very special person. 
Probably. I'm sure she was making an effort not to steal the show. I did notice!
I see the want to in your eyes...
Here's a summary:  "He's a dick, she's a dick, they're all dicks, you're a dick, I'm kind of a dick. Let me buy you a cocktail."
Same story here, but I'm Australian and living in the US. Hearing from my Aussie relatives about their moooooonths and months of leave and all the subsidies and benefits and stuff like that has me *seriously* considering moving back. But of course I had to go and marry an American and, you know, have a life here and everything. Bad move, self! :P
Preferably Friday for me.
Exactly what my Dad did.  The Nissan Leaf is literally a free car for us.
He's not in California either.
Every single fucking sunday   PTSD isn't a laughing matter but I swear I get squeamish when seeing a deflated bunker. 
Me and AOM want to be in the same group. 
&gt; Maybe you guys would be happier making a more mature community...  I think you're asking for a bit much.   You do realize you're speaking to the same people who are so enamored with a group of wrestlers because they say the word "Booty" a lot, right?
if it's downloaded you're all good, they have your info, so your ID's will be made, you're good
Planned Parenthood. They're under attack these days. They need both money (because the religious right keeps pushing to defund them entirely), and social support. 
maybe a storyline where he's defending the morlocks from some lex luthor type business magnate/crime lord would work without necessarily needing a specific supervillain. Although... I could see  a less complicated/powered down Sublime filling that role perfectly.
The dude in that video needs to stop picking on the robot. Some day the AI overlord is going to see the videos of how we treated its ancestors
Holy shit, I can't believe I didn't realize this earlier (though it's because I never have to think about it before), engagement ring isn't the same as wedding ring!  Why the hell do you need 2 damn rings?
No one is saying he's wrong.
It was also the best movie that year.
Read what I wrote again.  It is not a glowing endorsement of capitalism. It is mocking those priviledged people who think they did it themselves but had all the help in the world.
They probably mean goose, not moose - gustavson.
Not really.
Watching mom die from smoking related issues did it for me. Check out Alan Carr's Easy Way to Quit Smoking.  It eliminates the need for will power to quit.
Yep just wasn't sure if the pause where you float right after you teleport was enough to completely gobble up the start up of j.hp or not
the harder thing would be doing one dumb thing he hasnt done. he has ran in front of berserker, tried to take on rider alone, gone to school without a servant, tries to take on kuzuki, decides to try and charge at gilgamesh after he kills berserker, and thats just the ubw route.
Nvfz 15
Druid combo, as well as most of paladin's earlygame.
Do Republican voters dislike him more than Hillary? Probably not.
I had a phalaenopsis keiki in the exact same position this past summer. An elderly neighbor had left it on for so long that it had started blooming on its own, and had long aerial roots. I potted it in a terra cotta pot with slits up the side. I used a chunky bark/perlite mix with minimal moss. When I put it in, I slid some of the roots out through the slits so they still had room to breathe. It was also in full bloom when I did this, because the spike holding it up finally gave out.
People have Oscar parties?
great read. I hope we all do better to be more inclusive and fair in our clubs. 
Whoever commented, i think youre shadow banned or steam acc not linked.
[checking out /r/canucks right now](http://www.reactiongifs.com/wp-content/uploads/2013/05/flame-war.gif)
[relevant](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=eYlJH81dSiw)
The argument here was that a PC will likely "have to be updated before next gen". This is only true on the low/budget end and if you aren't satisfied with only console-esque settings/performance. (otherwise you don't "need" to upgrade at all)   My $800 build from nearly 2 years ago is still going to surpass *NEXT* gen consoles in performance left as is unless they can somehow manage beyond 1440p 60fps or 4k 30fps, nvm that DX12 will give PC hardware a substantial performance boost across the board by then as well.   You may have also seen me mention here I recently built an A10-7850k APU build for ~$220 for someone with a PS4 who was curious about PC. They were rather surprised how well it handled Rocket League and FO4 (pre-performance mods) by comparison considering the cost.  They don't "need" to upgrade anything for the duration of this console gen and likely won't even consider it. Presumably just like most people content with console-esque settings and performance and want something like a Steambox/pseudo-console/HTPC rather than a powerful gaming rig.
I think it is. Maybe not the *top* comment, but he never claimed that. 
What does it mean?!
that rule is horseshit u loser
Okay I used to kinda dislike Sansa, but for some reason, I now love her. It might have to do with the fact that I now picture her [this way](http://www.georgerrmartin.com/wp-content/uploads/2015/04/alayne_stone_oakenvia.jpg). lol..  Anyway, the only reason I really disliked her is because I reread GoT after the show was released, and honestly the Lady death is at Darry is much worse in the books, in terms of the culpability of Sansa.   In the show, Cersei pulls Sansa out to use as a witness. In the books, Ned Stark requests that she be woken up so that she can be a witness. The difference is that in the show, Sansa's resulting statements can be seen as a "oh shit I cant rebuff the Queen", and this minor difference serves to alert the audience that Sansa being benefits Cersei.  In the books, while Sansa acts almost the exact same way, it's vastly different. Instead of falling into a "trap" laid out by Cersei who knew that Sansa would be too shy and nervous to be honest, Sansa, for lack of a better word, betray's her father's expectations and does not absolve Arya of any wrongdoing.  In the show, from every relevant POV other than Arya, Sansa had no other choice, but in the book, Ned specfically asks for Sansa to be woken up, expecting her to behave completely differently.  I always thought this change was a really good change, since the scene in the book was probably more indicative of Sansa's role to come, while D&amp;D would have known her role had been since changed. 
Hes preparing her for a lifetime of publishing articles only to have some weirdo guy who's a master in your specific field come along and tell you all your data is shit
His real position is whatever he says at the time.  Right now his position is that of an insane tea party conservative who hates gays and Mexicans.  THAT is what you vote for or against him for.  Nothing he said before that matters.
She tells me that I need to get over what happened between her and her coworker because it's over and that I need to start acting like man now
If they are getting lower from vent the ramp rotate should definitely kill a planter if he's dumb enough not to plant behind the site, just like they would have killed a vent dive plant on old nuke.
Oh I agree, as powerful as they may be and stable.. this series is definitely not anything you can consider 'overpowered' for our growing demands on games.  Maybe so with an OC'd 980 Ti or 980 Ti SLI running in 1080. But that's as best as you're going to get to being 'overpowered' :P  Once again, I agree. I mean, look at The Division already - they held it back and admitted it.   I mean, some developers hold things back a TON intentionally - but then some really let free with the extras you can have in games compared to consoles.  RoTR is a good example of that. RoTR Max vs Xbox One is just night and day.
flyers stream bois?
Nice! Are you taking suggestions for religon names?
She's not too bad at it. It's much than the usual gone with the wind schtick.
Hey... That weren't me.
Apparently he did a live set in Minneapolis a few years back when Ben Klock was present. That's how he noticed him and signed him to his Klockworks label. AFAIK there even was a recording of a DVS1 live set of around 2009 but I haven't been able to find it. I wonder what that sounds like.
No way Ravens trade away future franchise star Travis Taylor for a scrub QB. 
No, only $2k worth of damage.  It fucked up the bumper good and the plastic undershield melted to the exhaust, but it was a surprisingly cheap fix for their insurance.
Hey DrShocker, I know you're just making a joke (and an admittedly funny one), but I just wanted to let you know that the word "retarded" is considered very offensive to the Intellectual Disability population.
This makes me want to die a little bit
Well we do qualify it by saying limiting, rather than eliminating.  I don't think lobbying in itself is bad, but it's kind of terrifying how much money a group like, say, the Koch brothers, can throw at a cause.  Certainly there is some hyperbole in 'you can buy politicians', but it does feel like monetary brinkmanship the way Google or Koch brothers are making it rain in DC (I know that's hyperbole as well, but it felt good to say)  /edit: traded quantify for qualify
&gt; So something works in a nordic region MUST work in America  And elsewhere in the Western world. None of his policies are specific to the Nordic nations. The same policies exist in Canada and Germany for example. 
You too? I want to tear it off the wall and burn it.
No need to miss those days. The game is still on steam and there is still some decent playerbase especially during sales.
Injectors
From the sidebar:  &gt;**Any drug solicitation, sourcing or linking to vendors for any reason in this subreddit will result in an immediate banning. This includes links to legal drug vendors.**  Consider this a warning. Check out the [**rules**](/r/Drugs/wiki/rules) for more information.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/researchchemicals) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Apparently they came early! Same with the Civil War Gamestop exclusive Cap. Weird thing is, I didn't see Kurama. I have him already so it's not too big of a deal.. But it feels wrong having only Naruto come in early.
It's both easier and harder than you think.  :-)
bricks were well and truly shat. lol
How should I do this til I get the range upgrade? 
that doesn't actually look terrible. It might also be that a Tesla isn't really anywhere close to a racing car (except for drag racing)
OmgItzChozen 
I love windows 10. It's just like XP with a search bar.   (I'm sure there's *loads* I'm missing out on treating it like this)
I'm more apt to believe they were not cheating without a link to a demo.  People cry fowl on here way too much so if you really give a shit what I think go ahead and link it.
An artist is often their own worst critic.
You will get them at the end. I don't think I know anyone who actually wears them. 
Every protein is different. It depends on how its processed and what additives are in it. But Muscle milk in general has a ton of fillers and is on the lower end of the quality scale. So it all depends. Hope this helps. 
What joke?
I've been trying this off and on for about a week and I haven't won a single auction, even when I've been doing it for 45 minutes straight 
http://www.porntrex.com/video/10739/don-t-break-me-ivy-stone-little-cutie-fucks-in-pink-kneehighs that's one
Sounds a lot like some pink guy shit
I heard $88 as well 
&gt; Not Duffleblog  It's kind of said that he had to say this.
I'm trying to use the Design Support Library but Android Studio will not auto complete XML attributes such as    app:layout_scrollFlags="scroll"   for me. I have the namespace in my outer-most element:   xmlns:app="http://schemas.android.com/apk/res-auto"  I have the dependency in Gradle:   compile 'com.android.support:design:23.2.0'  And it *does* auto-complete the widget names (android.support.design.widget.AppBarLayout etc) as I type them. I feel like I'm missing something really obvious...
Turd Sandwich/Giant Douche.  South Park has its finger on the pulse of American politics.
Replace 1/cos with sec and read my comment again
The comic Gladiator had the coolest power: confidence. As long as he believed he was strong enough to defeat his foes, he was. In one comic he hit Cannonball when his blast field was up. He was so shocked when Cannonball got up unharmed, he lost confidence in his abilities. Cannonball knocked him out in one shot. It explains why Gladiator is kind of a prick. Humility is his Kryptonite.
He's not really that unlikeable. And everyone loves him, so what the fuck are you on about?
Yellow best Game! Always wished the trainer at the end of Viridian had Pinsir though.
I'm going to have to snag the cash envelope idea. Like you, I think I tend to spend more just because I have a piece of plastic and can't see the money disappearing. It's always the little things too, like work lunches or impulse buys at the grocers.
Hey.  Great question.  The thing about walker assault is that the rebel fighters contribute a huge amount of damage to the walkers.  It's extremely easy to get the Heavy AT-AT damage achievement in a fighter.  If you ever noticed that the AT-ATs seem to take the most damage in the third phase, it's because there's usually no TIES in the air to focus their attention away from unloading huge amounts of damage on the walkers.  By clearing the air as the Imperials, or by maintaining air superiority as the rebels, you're actually contributing a lot to your team in walker assault.  Also, in the last patch, they increased the health of the walkers on all maps so having your team's fighters in the air is really important.  Of course there's always providing supporting fire on the uplinks to help your ground units and taking care of AT-STs.
What camera did you use to take these photos?
And you didn't even read my comment. Nice... I-- I guess...
Thankfully not! I just look all ways like 10 times when crossing at a 4 way stop now, the guy who hit me didn't stop at the stop sign smh all I wanted to do was read the lyrics to gtblessgo and get pizza 
Awesome. Thanks!
New flair?
^garcon ^means ^boy...
Yes that's an exploit that exists in the game now as a fp won't hit a zerker standing right in front of him.  You could also wall a doorway with a zerker and headshot big zeds as well but that's just another exploit twi hasn't patched out yet
So if Heatwave stayed in 2046 and they were able to prevent the Deathstroke Jr. invasion, like they said they would, after finishing Savage, Mick would cease to exist.  So Snart saved his ass exactly how told him in the ship with his patronizing speech. Nice!
Question for any Bernie supporter, and I really do want to know - why is Bernie doing so poorly against her?
It would seem the average trump supporter believes the answer to this question is 'Yes'.  Man, America has got terrifying.
If that's what you want to do, then go for it. I did the same~ Magician Maki idolized is my favorite card ever, she's amazing c:
lol its so easy to accept that whites treat blacks differently cause of skin color. But somehow asians get thrown into the mix, oh nah, absolutely nothing to do with skin color at all, cause you know black folks are so used to seeing asians succeed in the NBA. Such a norm.
He shrugs.  "Not much without my bows..." 
Not completely. I own one that's liquid cooled, but hard core guys still probably think of it as not "a real Harley." Ironic how I can pass them like they're standing still and in the meantime never overheat hahaha Technology is a bitch!
This is so special! Thank you!
At the beginning of the day I thought it was an unlikely goal. Kind of blowing my mind that we might blow by it.
Yeah, fuck Togashi and his stupid "physical health" and his stupid "spine injury".  You don't even need those to work 21 hours a day drawing a visual novel, some other guy wrote a thing while he was injured.  Togashi is so lazy smh/s
Meadville PA, home of the direct primary. I thought that was normal.
It's a fraction of a penny per stream 
added, name is kira :)
Was that just a low effort sarcastic comment or do you really believe there's no benefits?
That is copyright
I have a Snap-On beam type, and a full set of HF click types. The two from HF I can check against the beam check out. I bought a Kobalt 1/4" torque wrench from Lowes and it broke on the first use.  The HF click-types aren't garbage, but the quality isn't on par with Snap-On either. Using them back-to-back you'll see and feel the difference, but the accuracy is pretty much the same.
Isn't parallels pretty expensive?
When you think about it that's not that bad. Just compare it to fooling someone THREE times.
Give me Samuel L Jackson and it's decided. 
link287 318 hunter
Ducking you grandma
Have you played in them yet? I've never been a big barricade fan but these are tempting.
Okay, I like that idea. Does your boss have its normal amount of health, and normal attacks?
Did not miss out on any Announcement. This is the first time Brokers are hearing this too.  
Omg I totally get it.  I'm so thankful he gets it, but I didn't want him to have to get it, you know?   My recommendations (birth control effects everyone differently, so you may have the opposite reactions i did)   Started with samples my mom got from the doctors office she works at. They were okay but they would change every couple months.   Started taking Yaz, super expensive, worked well on mood swings, but I got yeast infections, gained SHIT tons of weight and when I had my period I was super nice but almost depression the rest of th months. Switched to Yazmin, which is another birth control for PMDD that was a lesser dose of hormones, was 'okay' my mood swings were a little better, but I was still all over the place.   Switched to some 4 dollar wal mart brand, it made me... CRAZYYYY not even dealing with mood swings, but like.. I would jump off the walls, and I would like have really bad anxiety about everything.   Then I switched to sprinted. I was 17.. Maybe 18? And it's been the light of my life. My mood swings have pretty much been turned down to like nothing. Sure, I get PMS-y but until recently, it was extremely controllable, and I could handle it. There was barely any weight gain, I wasn't breaking out, it deist make me anxious or depressed, my period came on the same day, it was the same period every month which I've never had before (last the same amount of days, it was the heaviest on the same days) and it made me feel soooooo much better.   Just recently I've been having my PMDD bouts again. Specially in January. Worst month I've had since I was a teenager (I'll be 23 next month) and it was just so uncontrollable and I fear it's coming back, ion by know if it's because I've been super duper stressed lately and it's a reaction to the stress, or what. I'm seeing my doctor in May to talk about my BC and if I have another severe bout like I did last month. 
Dear Spurs:  Pls stop winning.   The league^^^Warriors
It'll be back to new in no time
/u/autorelic what have you done?
Half the grid signed a contract to drive for Sauber.....
Poor guy..
Thank yooooooooou!
I was honestly just stirring the pot for sake of it. Thanks though for the detailed explanation of how the insurance industry works it is under appreciated by most of us. 
If they have access to a descent UMD they'll be able to acquire scrolls of Heal through the black Raven in the start of the next book.
Actually Granlund has done better than Shinkaruk in the AHL. So, what's your point?
100-0 is not the problem. People are taking grasp and stacking HP + resists.  They just kill you before you can even scratch their shields.
Since when is posting about a top post in /r/wtf also WTF material?  I could understand making a comment in the OP or even posting this in a different sub but come on dude...
IANAL but I was young and gay myself at one point, and had that happened only ten or fifteen years later than it did, I might have a story to tell very similar to yours. But will offer what I hope is some useful advice, and then indulge in a little rant. I understand if this will seem overly lengthy and annoying to some people, and I apologise in advance. But I think there are some things that OP needs to hear, and other things that I'd very much like others in this sub to read, about cases like this in general.  Because you're a minor right now, you still have a chance to clear this up while exposing yourself to minimal legal repercussions (I *think* -- check other replies, from people who know much more than I do) -- *but* you're also inherently in a weaker position to deal with any personal repercussions for exactly the same reason. It's an unfair catch-22, but there it is.  My advice is to find and contact your nearest chapter of a group called P-FLAG. They've been around for many years and are dedicated to helping children and families with queer issues. They can also connect you to legal resources that are especially suited to your situation, and provide support during what can't help but be a difficult situation. I would absolutely not try to go this alone. You need to make sure there's someone who has your back, and they can do that.  Coming clean *should* help to resolve the situation, though I think there could be other repercussions. Copping a plea isn't like it's depicted on TV. The actual process is slow and painful, and puts the accused in the position of explicitly affirming every detail of the prosecution's case. In short, if you're actually innocent, then this process is a form of contrived perjury, which is it's own crime. Your father will need excellent legal counsel, no matter what. And now for my rant.  Here again is an example of how our criminal 'justice' system has become very adept at railroading innocent people just so someone can put a notch in their belt. I don't disclaim the adversarial trial system, but rather the reward system for prosecutors and DAs, and maybe especially the sociopolitical structure that supports that. And all that's before even getting into our society's damaging hangups about sexuality in general.  More and more, I can't help but see victims of this system as whipping boys for our society's unresolved psychological problems. Sexuality of any kind that is not objectively harmful to someone is *normal*. Paraphilias are *common,* and while there are a few that should be of special concern if *acted upon,* their mere existence should not be a crime in itself, nor should be anyone's interest in *vicarious* satisfaction thereof, so long as no actual harm is done. (And I will agree that real photography constitutes harm, but not that *cartoons* do.) The criminality of an event needs to rationally measured against the perpetrator. That minors are tried as adults for taking photos of *themselves* is just crazy. Future generations will shake their heads and judge us harshly for stuff like this, and with every good reason.  Our society still has a huge amount of growing up to do, and while there are many areas ripe for improvement to explore, this one, which has repeatedly destroyed people and lives and families, seems particularly urgent to me.
Nah, calc 2 is easy man. If you got through calc 1, you'll be fine.
zkSNARK constructions are based on elliptic curves. Not sure if ECC will stick around for long time in the face of QC or other issues to be discovered. However, the premise of zk-proving arithmetic circuits is really lucrative. Hope we'll have a solid long-term security and better performance in 10-15 yrs. In any way, luckily, Bitcoin is pretty easy to convert to the purely hash-based signatures when needed.
*_*
Who's there?
&gt;...terrible mass-cite without explaining how it relates  Network security is currently paid for by money supply growth, as described in the link.  Low transactions fees are possible thanks to money supply growth, which is given to miners as the block subsidy. Money supply growth makes Bitcoin less scarce, and so less valuable than it would otherwise be - at least to a first approximation.  The block subsidy is a hidden fee that will disappear over time, leaving the question of who pays for securing the network. Consumers who pay for goods with VISA also pay a fee, but it's levied by the merchant.  I was agreeing with you, but noting that Bitcoin fees are also hidden to consumers.
I usually just say I have to use the little agent's room...
Mine was charged Sunday, No email or tracking till this afternoon from Tmobile and its still waiting to be scanned in by UPS.  BUT, way before t mobile It showed up on UPS by reference number tracking, give it a shot.
Another giant problem is that many liberal arts degrees have been watered down to the point of uselessness. While degrees like philosophy might not be *directly* relevant to real work, outside of teaching and philosophizing, they do teach people how to critically think *if taught rigorously*. After studying complex logic tables and dissecting dense passages of Immanuel Kant, philosophy majors go on to be logic-chopping machines who can read between the lines, making them fantastic lawyers, or even think creatively outside the box as CEOs, like Carly Fiorina. Unfortunately, if you're not going to a top 50 university, you're probably getting peddled bullshit designed to pass the people who have the money to pay, but not the brains to stay. This phenomenon is also partially responsible for a lot of the horrible work being produced in the humanities lately, too.   Of course, you need to have professional training to make a liberal arts degree marketable, a skill that aids the company in inventing, making, marketing, sustaining, and selling a product. Unfortunately, many colleges have deluded students into thinking that a degree is enough, and have failed to provide the resources necessary to make a degree profitable.  Maybe the problem is that all of the "perspective expanding" knowledge shouldn't be taught in college—it should be taught in high school. Americans shouldn't need more liberal arts after high school if they aren't going into academia. Save universities for intellectuals, STEM, and for more well-off people who have the time and money to spare. Expand trade schools and provide more paths to the workplace. Make more efficient networking opportunities than spending $40,000 a year at some private college.  The problem is that our high schools are utterly incompetent. The only way to get a half-way decent education is to go to a magnet school, and even then, the curriculum given to the top 10% of students in the United States barely match the curriculum given to average students in Europe or Korea. 
That is pretty sexy.
Insha'allah
That bird is a liar!
you have to pick a champ...   That is an afk check.  Forcing lock in literally does nothing but cost time and frustration in unintended dodges.
Quoting u/airjasper above here:  &gt; Dan basically stated in his press conference he would likely sign a hometown discount contract to stay with Vancouver. Trading him could have possibly burned that bridge...Or Dan goes deep in the playoffs and just greatly increases the cost to sign him come Summer....These potential scenarios are not worth a 3rd.
Don't you mean "Les Tits?"
&gt; I get that it isn't always as simple as this...  &gt; ...but it just boggles my mind how a long term LL partner, knowing how many times we've pursued, offered, occasionally begged for sex could come to the conclusion that they have any reason to feel they might be turned down.  Yeah, it's not the same for her as it is for me. Since she's responsive, her initiation wouldn't be based on a spontaneous desire like mine would be, but a conscious process. She's also afraid that she would *try* to get into it and initiate and then have to reject me after leading me on.  Also, she's afraid of not being "normal" so if she tries and fails to initiate then it reflects poorly on her self-image.  Yeah... it's all fucked. This is what counseling is going to be for.
It's profit/stake so you mean 1/20
Globally, I highly doubt the majority of prostitutes are like that. Is this research done in the US?
Because getting emulators to work properly is a massive pain in the arse, maybe? Or at least it was last time I tried coaxing DOSBox to run some ancient game from 1993 that I dug up on Abandonia because it was too obscure for GOG.com. Maybe console emulators are less hassle, I dunno.
Here are a few of mine  White Rabbit - Jefferson Airplane (psychedelic rock)  Nightcall - Kavinsky (synthwave/outrun)  Smells Like Teen Spirit - Nirvana (grunge)  Take Five - Dave Brubeck (cool jazz)
I livein VA. Most of the state is full of rednecks, however the dem vote comes from the highly populated Northern Virginia and Norfolk. The republicans hold a large majority in our state legislature
&gt;  If it was a stupid question people would have said so.  I did say so.
***Analyzing rodandanga***  * comments per month: 16.7 *^I ^help!* * posts per month: 2.5 *^lurker* * favorite sub [CFBOffTopic](http://NP.reddit.com/r/CFBOffTopic) * favorite words: really, Yeah,, never * age 5 years 0 months *^old ^man* * profanity score 1% *^Gosh ^darnet ^gee ^wiz* * trust score 103.4% *^tell ^them ^your ^secrets!*  * Fun facts about rodandanga  * *"I am gearing up for the 3 ring circus that a Trump-Hillary general election will be."*  * *"I've thought about not voting, but I've always felt that if you don't vote then you don't get to complain."*  * *"I am definitely a Goldwater/IKE Republican."*  * *"I am not a ideologue by any stretch of the imagination."*  * *"I am moderate as hell and both parties have abandoned me."*  * *"I've always liked Colorado and I hope MacIntyre, a Tech Alum, can get y'all back on the right track."*  * *"I am about as moderate as you can be, and both parties have tacked too far to the wings for my taste."*  * *"I've actually seen a few Sanders supporters talking about voting Trump, due to him also being a populist candidate."*  * *"I am a Spurs supporter and I know that the city is not contributing to the new stadium."*  * *"I am super conflicted."*  * *"I am someone that sits in the moderate side of politics, so I like to know all of the names for folks like me."*
If you know anything about the comics you already know the entire plot to the film.
Employers usually understand human nature, and know that muscular men aren't a threat to their PR.
They bomb the brown people.
SO you think if the Dems lose to the Republicans in the general they are going to move *left* ? When has that happened?
For those who say this is "overreacting", maybe it feels that way when you're sheltered in the middle of a pretty liberal campus or if you're young enough to have not experienced a time when people were not overwhelmingly accepting of lgbt people. But as a somewhat older queer grad student who has lived a little in the real world and who has been a victim of assault with that and other words being used against me, please know it is very real and it is not a joke. Seeing things like this, even in the context of an accepting place or of college shenanigans, is still hurtful and frankly a little scary.
Yeah doesn't make it right tho
It's likely the latter then.
If rather see them daily ;)  I'd have plenty to submit
Wow.  I had not heard that clip of Donald advocating for "taking out families" of terrorsts before.  That seems like a difficult position to defend. http://insider.foxnews.com/2015/12/02/donald-trump-fox-and-friends-we-have-take-out-isis-terrorists-families
I agree with this.  Pain is your body's way of saying "HEY! STOP THAT!" If you're bulging with nerve compression, you probably need at a minimum a laminectomy and possibly a micro discectomy to remove the bulge.  Sometimes the disc will move back in but it's rare. My L1-L2 did. Don't be afraid of surgery. My first one gave me 5 years of no pain/normal life. 
[Whaaa??](https://youtu.be/T8b0XhAoWxg?t=63)
One of my favorites! "You so STUPID!"
He got ripped. It was great.
Grow up and do coke like an adult.
Can you add me?? 
I can't tell if you wrote Trump or Drumpf lol
I think in one of Crazy Eye's flash backs they showed that she was talented. I don't remember exactly what it was though.   Norma's cult thing made some sense to me initially,, but I wish they had made her speak. She only spoke to the cult dude, which kind of sucked. In fact, imo, the longer that subplot dragged on, the worse it got. I didn't get the feeling that she craved attention like her husband did. It was kind of odd. 
Wizard Chogath and swordmaster yi
Added!
It was mainly because Trump made some weird remark about Jon Stewart (John Oliver's former boss) changing his name when he should "respect his heritage" and John Oliver was pointing out his hypocrisy. 
Yeah as they would, police departments usually are just for a municipality, sheriffs are the county, highway patrol is the highways and then State Troopers are secret squirrel stuff.   But usually at least in my area we're only allowed to arrest within our jurisdiction. Don't get me wrong if there's a shooting across the line and I'm close by ill go
My golly gosh, it's good to see others also saving up for the SSBFest and the FFT banner.   I was in the discord chat when the banners broke out and...it was crazy in there. Everyone going HAM and pulling Fusions swords left and right. The salt levels....oooooh the salt levels were high. And I was sitting there twiddling my thumbs with my 100 gem draw.   Now...the SSBfest can't come fast enough. My urge to do a relic draw is growing...
You've got an integrated card. Those aren't supported, so you'll get weird effects. I think the only way you're going to get around it is by disabling the day/night in the options.
The Daily Mail is no better. 
&gt; because why wouldn't they be cool with having money they earn and spend outside of the US taxed by the US?"  That's actually the easy part. Most of these companies are holding their profits overseas just waiting for a repatriation event where they can bring it all back for a significantly reduced rate.   In addition to what you said about funding continuous policies with one-time events, this policy would encourage corporation to continue keeping their earnings overseas for the possibility of bringing it back to the US at a much lower rate than had it been earned here. Government would be lowering overall corporate tax earnings but creating events of very high corporate tax earnings that they could drum up in the media to make it seem like it's a net benefit
Hedgehog laughs maniacally at the end.
then he should have gotten one.
Depends on whether you believe in predestination or not.  If you're into predestination, God is literally the worst railroading DM ever.
[MR every time I've looked /r/Arrow for the past week](http://i.imgur.com/fX0gzZd.gifv)  But in all seriousness, I understand the frustration with the writing, I just miss the fan community that existed during earlier seasons. Arrow's always been kind of cheesy, but that's part of the charm.
&gt;If I have an extremely focused deck where I'm not using all my sideboard slots  ok, I'm not taking what you say seriously.
You got an answer an hour ago in the top comment and your ignoring it.
I do have a gym membership that I utilize, yes. I'm pretty unfit right off the bat due to a lot of circumstances but I'm transitioning into a healthier lifestyle slowly but surely. After finally coming out I've become a lot more comfortable with my body and how I want it to look, so yes my physique is something I'm learning to value. Also the testosterone makes working out a hell of a lot more fun. 
*I agree with the first comment. Also, you might wanna put up some original works so we can see and comment on them better. Other than that, I like your art.*  *A tip from me: whenever I'm drawing something original, like my favorite aliens (yes, I'm a huge Martian fan), I tend to base a a body part off other types of cartoon characters (like the four fingers on my main character is usually a reference to most four-fingered characters, or the eye shape based off those seen in My Little Pony/Equestria Girls).*  [Here's my blog if you want to see it.](http://anita-clarence-seriene.tumblr.com/)
yolo ma nigga
You have hurt my heart. 
Baiting title, these are examples of male territory communication. 
"Wow, look at that human being that is never going to have any interest in me. Let me watch them creepily from the shadows and hope they make eye contact with me."
Are you insinuating you would survive a Nipple Lighting?
Ok, single payer support. That's a valid policy to not like. What about her character? Could she do or say something that would make you stop supporting her?
Why are their videos always so fucking long? I couldn't even make it past where he was explaining that he was making a video. I guess being right went from talking louder to talking longer?
Better be wrong than in a sorry state.
I don't find that fact fun in the slightest. 
Eh what can you do. It is what it is. Never really bothered by it. 
Nett
How about utterly beautiful female!
&gt; we just assume our opponents are misguided and haven't seen reality yet.  This is how I see it, Tories are nice people who just need waking up! 
Thanks for adding that.
He broke his ankle recently and has never played a full season. Only thing I can think of.
Rip George Kennedy, I loved the naked gun trilogy, their my favorite comedies of all time. Him and Leslie Nielsen were amazing in those movies
Cheese quantities need to be quadrupled.
Well you'd be surprised how many Americans have no idea who Messi is. Soccer isn't as popular over here. I wouldn't expect Russians to know who Lebron James or Peyton Manning are. And Rogan isn't really a "sports guy", he's an MMA guy. He admits he doesn't follow American football or other sports
She doesn't fit a -dere archetype.
I'm so bereft at the ending of Downton Abbey that my husband convinced me to watch that Showtime pirate show, Black Sails with him (he's been watching it since the beginning), based solely on the fact that it's a period show and most of the cast is British.  It took a few episodes, but I'm totally hooked now and am considering once again shucking all the filing I had planned to do tonight to lie on the couch and watch the rest of season two. I've been weepy today, so why not?
&gt;Napolitano said the latest batch of emails include information on drone strikes and that Clinton, as secretary, should have known a classified document when she saw it. Oh come the f on.  *That* isn't enough?
If the Big Ten removed Nebraska and Penn State they would become the Little Ten
Assuming you can get by with just a crossover, a Toyota RAV4 would probably be the best bet.
His wife played the super-redneck hick soldier in Edge of Tomorrow (which is a highly underrated movie).
Playing 2-headed giant online, needed to clear the opposing board so I went all-in on Death Cloud. Oops. Hit my team twice for a total of 26 (x=13), and left our opponents alive.  It did clear the board, though.
Not quite. Hillary charged $225,000 for one speech.  But it's doable! Keep the money flowing, people. Let's force Hillary off the campaign trail and back into the fundraising boardroom. It would be a blessing, because she is much more comfortable there anyway. #BeNiceToHillary!
angles/ankles pun I presume
Nice non sequitor.
sounds great, thanks
Hey Ice King WHYD You Steal Our Garbage? - $20  Mario Tennis Open - $20  New super Mario Bros. 2 - $25  Super Mario 3D Land - $30   Link Between Worlds - $35  ?? 
[Trade Link](https://steamcommunity.com/tradeoffer/new/?partner=135297939&amp;token=dmVd1SMp)  123549  Basically HW
The most disappointing thing is that this includes zero pineapple. 
Something something money and trading with people
Wow nice bed man I bet your s/o lives this blanket all that's missing is your race car bed !
In essence, Uber is now making more money than ever in NYC, While drivers make the sake of not less. In these big city', drivers had decent turn around time between customers, meaning, they were doing alright, so to say. But now that prices have dropped and demand has picked up, that doesn't necessarily mean that the drivers are making more, because they can only hands so many trips per day. But if Hi! This is Matt, your Uber driver campaigning for more drivers to sign up, this trend will continue, and drivers will make less and less and uber more and more.   I think. 
Yeah but if he plays under the tag and has a career ending injury he loses out on guaranteed money from a huge contract. I'm pretty sure thats why Drew Brees said he wasn't going to play under the tag a few years ago.
and somehow muting them is unacceptable 
I once read the concept that mankind has tried to make itself unnecessary since the beginning of the Industrial revolution (and arguably before that), and now that we are actually on the edge of realizing that dream, we'd better make up our minds on how we would like to live once we're actually there. Personally, I can immagine a basic income work out well in the first world. The magic idea is: if we don't need a single human to provide for all our basic needs - why do we have to work to support ourselves (for the most basic things). Sure, anybody who wants more can work, but if there's no need for human labor for our species to survive, why should we keep up a concept where working is mandatory?
Wow, even things like instant messaging are included.
Stairway to Hotel Freebird.
Please help I've been looking for help Who can I use to beat cell?  http://imgur.com/a/JphlX
It works some of the time. I've seen some pretty mean deathballs in 2.3k. 
That is talent right there.
Lucky blond mohawk motherfucker.
Don't get me wrong, I'm a big fan of John Oliver and a lot of the points of view that he brings to the table, but I thought that in this particular episode, a lot of what he was saying was just masked by humor pandering to a liberal audience. Just my two cents. Funny episode though.
*There totally was a missing persons report. -_-*  *Greg stalls, finally noticing the tension going on. An affable and sociable guy, he instantly realises he needs to smooth things and quickly. With a heavy sigh and a smile, he turns to Contraband and, perhaps a little naively, invites him in.*  "Thank you for bringing our daughter home...uhhh....sir. We've been beside ourselves with worry, I can't tell you how much this means to us. Can I...would you like to come in? This is our daughters friend, Lily."  *At the sound of her name, Rowan raises her head - my god she's a mess - and smiles over at Lily. She'd rush over and hug her, but Greg and Rose simply won't let go.*  -----  /u/skazzythescav 
They should lower the price of beer at the arena tonight. :)
I'm a bouncer in a bar and I can't escape it. Lots of Trump supporters round here
No, she had no fucking clue that the email she was sending wasn't encrypted and would be violating OPSEC. Literally zero of the other candidates would, too. That's why the problem here is not what she did, but that she wasn't told not to do it.
This technology will ultimately make meat suitable for vegans.
ah the wise, asking for a price. Why don't you just turn yourself in? Save a step...
Yea because Na companies are the only companies that can have good customer support, such ignorant comment.
Quality
886,017
Paki tape is most halal. 
I usually just take a central theme and see where it goes.
I bet you already know this but I'll just mention in case anyone else doesn't that you can view a site "in desktop mode" by long pressing the reload button in Safari and tapping "Request desktop site" or clicking that same button in the action extensions menu.
Humanity would be spayed and neutered...
Idk how brief you're talking, the gif you linked shows he caught himself and had his hand on his head.
We've only been dating for 3 weeks. I don't think I'll be seeing her anymore.
Dont worry you can roleplay as little or as much as you want.
Stainless steel is a bit less accurate but the taste is just the best.
:(
That thing is about to fall out
Can you post an actual crash log? The mission .trk doesn't actually tell anyone anything useful.
You remember the 90s/00s when it was basically 1 flying lap and nobody came out until the end? It was shit. 
Sorry i meant resistance and coup :D. Ok we dont really have a nice games group where I live. But I will watch a ton of videos for El Grande Thanks :D
With no visual aids explain tying a shoe.
Cool, i'm in CA too, will create trade this evening!
Do Bob and Larry have lightsabers?
Yes, you need more than one data point to draw any conclusion.
now Mr. Krabs
Nice is for everyone who isn't McPoyle. 
[Original post](https://www.reddit.com/r/OldSchoolCool/comments/48ddx6/a_local_drivein_restaurant_1969/) by /u/WeededDragon1 in /r/OldSchoolCool 
Hey Flames fans. How are your commentators? Using a flames stream tonights?
4 ?
Does anyone seriously think that some government policy is going to stop teenage kids being cunts to each other? It's a throwaway policy designed to justify the existence of some branch of the Education Department. Teenagers are arseholes and will always victimise one another. No amount of pamphlets, Chaplains, Social Workers or government directives will change this. If anything, it'll make gay kids more susceptible to abuse.  'Hi everyone. The following kids are gay, be nice to them because the Education Department says so.'  That'll work just fine.
Say Goodbye by IKTPQ would be my choice. Perfect blend of metal and hardcore, metal lyrics, great breakdown, catchy as fuck.  I like Tears Don't Fall but I don't see BFMV as a straight up metalcore band, they're a fringe band to me. 
Ah sorry, I assumed that (you didn't say it or imply it). But yeah, you can contribute it now and not claim it (no tax refund) until you earn more money. The only advantage you would have from doing this now (as opposed to later) is going to be the tax-sheltered growth of whatever is inside your RRSP for the X number of years until you claim it on your taxes. Which is actually nothing to scoff at.
Whoops. Got shitfaced last night and forgot here ya go: http://imgur.com/u1VIx02
Reddit is making progress. This was a good opportunity for the Rubio meme and no one did it. Good job guys.
State Farm. When I was 19 and under my mom's policy she had mailed a check and apparently a secretary had left the check in a mail sorter and after the payment was due we immediately lost coverage. The reason I know this was because the place I was buying my car from (buy here pay here place) required full coverage while you were still making payments on your car (pretty much all places do). But here's the kicker, this buy here pay here place would come pick up your car if they found out you didn't have full coverage. So the very next day that our payment had been due I hear a tow truck in my back driveway and they were taking my car. I asked why, seeing as my payments were up to date and I was informed that since we didn't have full coverage on the car it was being towed. Since it happened at night I couldn't call our agent and find out why they seemed to think we had no coverage, the check had been mailed. The day after that we were told that our coverage was suspended due to missed payment. My mom told them that was bullshit and that the check had been mailed. After arguing for about an hour they immediately start apologizing once they find the check. Unfortunately, my car had already been towed and I had to pay $250 to get my car out from the impound. The insurance refused to pay the fee even though it was their fault. Their reasoning was if we had payments auto-drafted instead we could have avoided that situation all together.
The point of doubledipping is that you don't have enough condiment. @ouldn't using two make it worse?
Are you seriously denying that who lives in your country is more important? It decides everything else about your country.  Duh
Ok,I'll just say that even with hookups it's perfectly ok to talk about this stuff. Just because it's casual encounter doesn't mean it has to translate into a awkward, intimidating fumble. Have a bit of confidence and engage with them on some level, most guys will respond in kind.
Native
I think that the other part of the issue here is that it's not fair to ask her to bite her tongue if people are mean to her, rude to her, or insult her to her face. I get that no one wants a fight at the wedding, but if Sasha agrees not to provoke or pick at fight with the family, then the family should agree to not provoke or pick a fight with her. Fair's fair. IF OP explains the situation to Sasha, which is that OP's family won't be accepting, and Sasha says that she'll come and avoid confronting or fighting with anyone, then OP should also explain that situation to her family and tell them that they can't make nasty, bigoted, or passive aggressive comments.
Sent.
At first I was like..."he's not getting jerked off..." and then the "oh." moment came.
Doubt he's going to hop in a van and drive from sunny California to stinky Ohio for 1 show.  Looking forward to seeing more dates!   Also hush you west coasters he tours your area way more than anywhere else
**HD Stream** [Utah Jazz @ Boston Celtics](http://www.nbastream.net/utah-jazz-at-boston-celtics-live-stream.html) 3500 kbps,60 fps , mobile compatible , similar to Youtube  *** Streamup may still have issues, if the video will lag please change to the SD stream! ( the SD player is not mobile compatible )   If anybody wants to help with a small donation, here's the link : https://imraising.tv/u/cflorin23 Thanks!  Bitcoin : 1HaF6pzhrbE7wMzfuQAGdBEemSWbkPQ2tF  The video will be changed soon to game feed
I know it would be nice to see a little more from him but if he keeps tracking the way he is the price keeps going up. Yeah definitely an odd situation for any team and super rare for us. I think most picks from 4th to 7th are more or less the same but I [looked it up](http://www.hockeydb.com/ihdb/draft/teams/dr00005632.html) we have only hit on three 6th round picks since 1981. Some years we didnt have a 6th but in 35 years, including Davidson, we have turned only three 6th round picks into something close to a useful roster player. The other two were Anatoli Semenov  (1989 - 362games) and Steve Smith (1981 - 804games). Obviously picks don't mean as much in regards to his development but still his draft position and how he sort of made a big leap definitely make it a unique situation for us.
What are they?
/thread
I assume some of them are good people.
He picked it up on his own.   I have a ball that I used to throw and he would chase it. Then one day he just brought it back to me and dropped it. Thus begun the never ending war of fetch. 
IshDARR would be great at TDE
I'm hoping for a Noir and Assassin Spiderman eventually! 
I lost because I couldn't shoot a 4th time vs beth miho avnore active blasting me. Hate this game sometimes.
FML.. i need to dump all my eau d toilette
Someone please tell me what I can do with this. I don't know much about PCs. If I bought this, what are the possibilities as far as PCs/gaming/internet browsing/streaming video?
He just wants to make America Drumpf again.
Nope. Bernie or Stein. Hillary is everything I hate about the Democratic Party while Bernie is everything I wish they would fight for. And I've been registered as a Dem since I could vote in my first election in 2004 and have voted in elections every year since. I don't miss them even if it's one guy running unopposed. If she actually was running a respectable campaign on the issues and why I should vote for her, I would have considered it.
With my dad, much much better.  He was physically and psychologically abusive when I was a kid.  It was... really bad.  It wasn't as bad after I moved out, but only because I kept communication to a minimum. He's done a complete turnaround.  He apologized for my childhood and we've gotten really close. What changed?  He and my mom had to take care of my niece, my sister's daughter.  My sister abandoned her and my niece's father was abusive to her.  So my dad saw what he'd done to us being done to his granddaughter and realized how shitty it was.
Except it's true.
"Half-Life 3" lmfao
I used to hate them because of my weight. Now it's mainly a privacy thing. Also I generally go to a lot of stuff alone, or with friends who don't take a bajillion pictures. 
Okafor is out. Lord help us.
&gt; nothing really happened this part  Yeah, just apart from the fact that you're at war with all your neighbours, fighting a very bloody war against Portugal, and that you took up a lot of the screen time (well, more then Funland), it was a pretty boring part for you. :)
Doesn't solve the problem for bases like Hossin construction sites.
It arrived today! Just tested it with a friend and it works. Thanks man
What if your constituents are a bunch of rich assholes?
You are a god amoung men.
Did staal score yet?
ok.. good to know. thanks. is it legal then, with the grill? quasi-legal? do you know exactly what the problem would be even with a grill? (ie. 'dealing with a lot of bureaucracy')
As far as I'm aware, he ended up taking first year, like, three times. Probably one of the only guys that I literally despise.
Actually the slightly deflated ball is supposed to help Brady - the other team had properly inflated balls which wouldn't hinder them per se but wouldn't give them what small advantage the deflated ball would
You don't know what I am. I just had a glass of gin and am drinking a beer currently. Sometimes it don't be like it is but it do
Islamist babysitters are probably going find it a bit hard finding jobs in the future.
Yup. It's the PSP version but plays great on the Vita as well. Just buy it off of PSN. It's probably the best version of it to play since it includes both the male and female protagonist routes.  https://store.playstation.com/#!/en-us/games/shin-megami-tensei-persona-3-portable/cid=UP0005-ULUS10512_00-SMTP3PDIGITAL001 http://megamitensei.wikia.com/wiki/Persona_3_Portable
He can't get people to out to vote for him, let alone enough to overcome GOP gerrymandering.
He looks a little bit young for a mile long walk to me :/
Congratulations!
I'm an Electrician and I'm quite high. This is fantastic.
Yes that's where I read it! I'd love it, there's such a hole missing in the hip hop/rap section of the line up.. We can only hope though
Because its global and usually its 0:00 per country. Now its gonna be 6:00 CET
alovenski diaspori v avstraliji zih nou ušeč, bojo rekl "janša pomagaj" i JJ bo priletel na krilih kranjskega orla
I don't think you have done enough research on each candidate. Based on your comments you are probably better off with Sanders compared to others.   Keep in mind, not all candidates will share the same interests as you so you just have to pick one that you think will lead the country in a direction similar to your vision.   Also your state/local reps are way more important than the next president. They are people you can pressure and the ones that make laws in your location.
Great Sherpa. Brought a whole group through and was very patient with everyone and explained everything really well. We also finished faster than I expected.  Would run with him again. Very chill dude. 
It's more wanting to try something different. Once, my friend and I did a joint filled with some kief that we covered in oil. Wasteful, wasteful, but fuck of that thing didn't burn for 20 minutes
god I hate that kind of shouty EDM style rap jesus christ
2 Weekend 1 passes - located in Bay Area. PM please.
A meme-less society.
Justin vs Flocker grand finals was pretty bad too
I don't know why but for some reason I read this in Robert Stack's voice...anyways kudos to you for going to the school.
And the next day he claims he doesnt know about them and has to do research.  Stop fucking lying.  There might come a day where you need to have people believe you 
Like it is really hard to tell if you are being serious or not. 
I think it's a little disingenuous to compare the chaplain program to the situation in the UAE. If we're serious about promoting gay rights universally, which we should be and have stated we are, it's far more important to focus on the country in which homosexuality is literally punishable by death.
My thinking is that Monday is going to be the last day here for me until I see it thursday night.  It might be a day earlier then needed but I leave nothing to chance with this kind of thing.
Seriously?
Evading YouTube's content ID system. Is it better than cropping? Not sure.
I have this problem going out to dinner with my dad. He had me when he was 18. Then remarried and had kids when I was 18+. So when we go out without their mother it's automatically assumed I'm the mother. Awkward.
I'm good at figuring out why something isn't working. Usually work related things, but not always. I think I might have better overall pattern recognition than most
Its a lack of logic period to expect a business to cater to a group that hasn't been buying their games.   Now lets talk about catering. In a lot of single player games, its story driven. Now games like Skyrim, Fallout, Mass Effect, Dragons Dogma, and Dragon Age all have a character you can customize and even talks! Using preselected voices and not at all changing how the character behaves man or woman. Then we have games like the Witcher, where you play as Geralt and you either accept he's a white dude with white hair and cat eyes who loves women or you can leave it. What's the difference? Romance options that make you either gay or straight. Congrats! You have added nothing to your game. It doesn't affect the story, it doesn't change how the story will be told except the footnote of "Player Character is in a relationship with NPC".   If a character is well written, race, gender, sexuality, and every other feature doesn't matter. I could play as a black trans otherkin, and so long as the writing is good and its not a huge wank about how progressive the person is, I'll enjoy it. Pandering doesn't make a good game. Representation doesn't make a good game. Writing does. 
Aww man, that must be rough.
OP - I'm always curious about the insurance on something like this. Can you speak to the classification?
Basically first thing I recommend doing is checking that service is available at your address. The reason for this is that at&amp;t does not use the standard copper wires to deliver service so it is not available everywhere. For at&amp;t home service there are to main choices, uverse tv and direct tv. The shorter contracts are with uverse tv and the better promotions right now are for direct tv. When it comes to internet it will be uverse no matter which tv you go with. When it comes to speed that will also depend on your address. Feel free to pm me also. 
Neither actually. She saw it, took it as gossip and spread the rumour around my extended family that it was happening. My dad confronted me about it, etc etc. It took a long time to iron out and was pretty awkward.
There is also a spoken component which is taken after they pass the written section.
i imagine an October release for pokemon and November release for NX
Says the Irishman. 
[@ryfi4daze](https://www.instagram.com/ryfi4daze/)   Dunks, some travel, some electric guitar, and some outdoor stuff.
np mr brwn
I would CRINGE if I ever sent an e-mail like that, hahaha!
I would hate to have Singler on my team. That is a very great point you make. 
Well at least Goku is super overpowered compared to the U6 fighters. Even Frost himself couldn't understand how Goku had so much power. 
Why is it a joke?
Yeah, no doubt - they are inconsistent and very sensitive to lag.
Rather have them fix the game rather than add more stuff to the game that can break...
I would absolutely eat this
That's Elton John
He made contact a year ago.  http://www.independent.co.uk/news/world/asia/mummified-german-sailor-manfred-fritz-bajorat-found-off-philippines-on-yacht-missing-for-a-year-a6904011.html
Problably. Most of the time it doesn't really make a difference.
Fun chapter w/ the mother can't wait to see how it goes
They should.  She's on her third marriage.  
So much pain in one photo
Ah nuts... Looks like I'll have to do another $20! :)
 if (gps-&gt;next_direction == STRAIGHT)   do_drive("forward");  else if (gps-&gt;next_direction == RIGHT)   do_drive("turn right");  else if ((camera-&gt;object == true &amp;&amp; (some_sort_of_speed_calc == "Accident"))  do_drive("break");  else if . . .  While my logic there is bad (break should be first, but whatever) isn't that hard. I mean, we've had pretty good AI for racing games for years and those are after thoughts of the game developers.   The hard part is proving in the public mind they're safe, not the programming.  If you want to learn how to understand it, take some classes in programming. That isn't enough of course, so start your own project. What project you say? Pick a problem and solve it. Want to get the price of a specific item on Amazon? Write a program to do it for you. Need a tool to move your steam games from one place to another? Write it. Just keep making tools and finishing them and you can become a programmer too. Shit is easy, if this, then that. Over, and over and over and over. . . From the most basic hello world program to Watson. 
It turns me on how I kill all your dreams and ambitions ~ &lt;3 
I love pans
You. You're the joke. 
Too soon 
on my profile and idk whats wrong with my tradelink
Not a fan of anime, sorry. I understand that it's more of a medium than a genre, but the majority of content seems poorly thought out to me. 
you aren't getting what I am saying, Nords are not from Calradia and do not evolve from any faction that was ever in calradia prior.  What you are saying is like saying that the Anglo-Saxons turned into the Normans. 
Now, I don't know if you have any interest in prog metal, but if you have a hair of interest listen to them. Just, trust me. Mmmmm they are so good.
Feedback for /u/scribbling_des can be found [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/pmsfeedback/search?q=scribbling_des&amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;sort=new&amp;t=all)  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/Pmsforsale) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Oooh!  I like this idea a lot!  Perhaps the next one on the list is Ulamog, as he may be a bit easier to construct.  Thanks for the feedback!
Wow 9.2% worse from 3 that's pretty awesome.
In theory yes but in practice it would be colossally terrible advice for a new player.
/r/u/dlp211 , can you tell me something about the procedure HR's follow and what can I make out from the email?
Was it really written that long ago. I always thought that the animals wrote it. 
Hell, just leave it in .xls or .xlsx and let Pandas (Python) do the legwork.
This is the shopped version.
Cord cutting is really tough for sports fans. By the time you get all the soccer games you're looking for (legally), you're just about at the cable bill price. And everyone is starting to crack down on VPN use. Netflix users are going nuts about it. The antenna and Sling TV are a must, for general TV and sports. I don't know that I would recommend HBO Now unless you watch a lot of HBO. $185 a year is pretty steep for cord cutters. You can get a current season pass for the HBO shows for about $25 per show on Amazon or Vudu. Again, depends on how much HBO you watch. Same goes for Fargo, I would just get the season pass from Amazon.
wah
DART fare enforcement are assholes. One time I got a ticket because we were in a dead zone for a few minutes and they weren't willing to wait a couple minutes. Train was practically empty, too
golden
Where is timezone bot when you need him ;_;
Kind of sad there isn't more catchy songs like Doki Doki and Iine! 
Hold on, gonna get my game :)
The funny thing is that's the one political office I would feel comfortable with Carson in it. He says some crazy shit, but by all accounts he is a brilliant doctor.
I like cockwomble of late. 
indeed indeed...at least we have Reddit which is fairly reliable.
I used an app called "Pikazo"  http://Pikazoapp.com  If you are on a traditional computer, you can use:  http://dreamscopeapp.com
There's someone defending fascism in that chain. Not just fascist ideas with rejection of the label, but actually defending the concept of fascism and using it's name.  It takes me back to how odd it was to see the term 'fascist' worn with pride in The Conformist, considering how today the term's basically a slur.
&gt; I think that Arenado's glove would make him more valuable.  What makes you say he's that much better at fielding than Machado?
I was super disappointed in I think it was the 3rd movie where they redid that exact scene except no boob.
So LOD is showing 0 points this week and Altec is showing 37. Does this mean Lod was only a weekend sub and Aletc is back?
Okay I understand now. The issue is that GoogleFinance has a "lag" period where it goes to fetch the data. When a cell relies on another cell reference it can't pull the data because GoogleFinance hasn't returned it yet.   To remedy this, I'd recommend an auxiliary sheet to hold the historical currency conversion rates as fixed values instead of calculated values through a formula. [Food for thought](https://webapps.stackexchange.com/questions/88533/index-formula-throws-random-ref-errors-due-to-illogical-column-value-out-of)
011101000110100001100101011100110110010100100000011000100110100101101110011000010111001001111001001000000110010001101001011001110110100101110100011100110010000001100001011100100110010100100000011011000110111101101110011001110110010101110010001000000111010001101000011000010110111000100000011000010110111001111001001000000110010001101001011001110110100101110100011100110010000001110100011010000110010101111001001000000110100001100001011101100110010100100000011010010110111000100000011101000110100001100101011010010111001000100000011100000110000101101110011101000111001100101110
What were they actually doing?!
What kind of wrestling do you like to watch on your down time and how much do you watch? Any favorite promotions?
I like Brinda but I don't know if I could listen to him everyday 
"The cloud" is similar to a bank, just replace money with data.  Yes you can store your own data on your own computers, but you will only be able to withdraw that data from that single point. Instead wouldnt it be great if you had a bank with ATM's where you can just withdraw data from anywhere you are. Thats what the "cloud" is. Its sort of a databank.   Plus you now dont have to pay for security, armed bank robber (hackers), atm machines (replication).
It's like applying for jobs.
they look pretty sleek! only, I'm under a really tight budget...Thanks for the referral anyways, it definitely gave me something to look forward to in the future!
To set up a good trade all you have to do is sell an item at a reasonable price that people will buy. Also, follow all the rules and look at competitor prices.  EDIT: Never ask for quicksells
Thank you so much for your response. You're right.
Agreed. They are really starting to put it together at the right time. Don't want to seem them in the big dance. 
[New article about this.](http://www.sltrib.com/home/3596397-155/slc-police-investigation-continues-in-wake?fullpage=1)  &gt; There are four felonies and eight misdemeanors listed on his intake history, which include third-degree felony counts of aggravated assault with a weapon, theft and retail theft, as well as lesser crimes of criminal trespass, criminal mischief, theft and using a dangerous weapon.  &gt; The records show Mohamed has spent 122 days in a detention facility and 583 days on probation.
loving it so far, thanks
Also, [the golden monkey](https://www.reddit.com/r/spelunky/comments/3x3fes/golden_monkey_not_only_angered_the_shoppy_he/?ref=search_posts) (and I guess the crystal monkey too, then) can act as a deadly weapon against shoppy.   I found this out by accident as I was setting monkey down in what I thought would be a safe spot.
"I have no problem with slapping you again." *she warns, pointing at you severely.* "Let's try to keep that stuff to a minimum. Like, in the negatives." 
Why is this nsfw?
How do you get rsi by playing 20 pp maps
Floors 1-10
Hit it right on the head... This is my only serious worry about DS3.  Let's hope From don't go full retard mode, and ATLEAST make you able to duel at equal health % trough red soapstone signs and dragon covenant (if there is one). It's gonna be sad if invasions put you at a MASSIVE health disadvantage, but if we can atleast duel at equeal % health I'll be happy.  Now, if there is literally no way to fight at equal health and someone will always be at lower health, aka no possible way to duel fairly... You'll have fucked up, FROM. *You'll have fucked up*. RIP PvP scene.
http://www.realestate.com.au/buy/between-250000-300000/list-1  Here are at least 4 pages of property valued between 250k- and 320k. They are all cheaper than what I paid for my house.  If you can't afford these, then YOU are your biggest problem.
Australia, never seen one in my life.
I think a copper red would look so awesome on you!  If you don't want to go so wild, do a dark plum color! 
Also muss Deutschland für alle muslimischen Länder die Verantwortung übernehmen? Warum?
Quickselling is a different story, lol. If you sell basically anything at 80% it will get an offer in a couple minutes, haha.
He may switch positions, but every politician does. I voted for Obama in 2008 and he didn't deliver on any of his promises. Politicians are liars and cheats, Trump flip flops on some things but I actually like his liberal positions so it doesn't bother me.
Holy shit the links in these threads always make me so sad.
All over a measly half mile? My goodness. I'd need something stronger than tea to handle that shit.
World bosses and open world faction pvp are the only things that benefit from high pop servers. 
Alice in chains man. 
As far as I can recall, they pretty much just refer to it as "the island," but the smaller island next to it is known as "Hydra Island."
He knows **exactly** what he's doing.  He's trying to change /r/WTF to be more like /r/Europe.
So what you're saying is, the platform was made in such a ham-fisted and limiting way the users and third party software developers have to work around all of these issues that aren't nearly as much of a problem on other major platforms.
yea imagine being my sister  (congrats fuccboi)
What bomber is that?
LOL alright bud, this is from 2012 and it is in DS condition.. you trippin
&gt; Secret Service  Wow. I googled it and they are pretty independent from all other forms of government. 
No quotes from anyone at the club. He did media yesterday and there was no mention of a race to be fit. On top of that the journalist is a grub. 
Although PCT miles are easier in general, the Quad State Challenge is mostly comprised of fairly easy AT miles. The footing and grade of Maryland is rather similar to the majority of the PCT. Yes, there are some rocky sections north of I-70, but the PCT has similar footing from time to time.  Don't let that get you down though, I just mentioned it to give you an analog for the PCT. Most folks who attempt the Quad State get torn apart just because it is (usually) a 25+% increase over mileage they've been doing and, as a result, their bodies just aren't ready.
Try american crew fiber, i also have asian hair.
Just keep it warm and let it go. That yeast LOVES heat. It'll eventually finish.   I fermented at 95 with good results.
Unless TLOP is released for sale it won't be a candidate for nomination at all 
[**@bonnienorman**](https://twitter.com/bonnienorman): &gt;[2016-02-29 20:40:43 UTC](https://twitter.com/bonnienorman/status/704405962426159105)  &gt;[@UtahGov](https://twitter.com/UtahGov) Your bill would make it harder to purchase an American product in [#Utah](https://twitter.com/search?q=%23Utah) than in China. Think about that. &gt;[*twitter.com*](https://twitter.com/bonnienorman/status/704397065552416768)  ----  [^[Mistake?]](/message/compose/?to=TweetPoster&amp;subject=Error%20Report&amp;message=/48ddq3%0A%0APlease leave above link unaltered.) [^[Suggestion]](/message/compose/?to=TweetPoster&amp;subject=Suggestion) [^[FAQ]](/r/TweetPoster/comments/13relk/) [^[Code]](https://github.com/buttscicles/TweetPoster) [^[Issues]](https://github.com/buttscicles/TweetPoster/issues)
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Long_hot_summer_of_1967  I low-balled the number of riots as it goes. It was 158 race-based riots in 1967.  Regarding bomb threats, I remember Dan Carlin talking about it, but I can't find any sources in the few minutes I can currently spare.  EDIT: Here we go: this is the kind of environment I was talking about:  &gt;In 1970 alone, an estimated 3,000 bombings and 50,000 bomb threats took place across America.   https://www.fbi.gov/about-us/history/a-centennial-history/and_justice_for_all_1954-1971  It was just civil rights activists, but also the far-left, the KKK, anti-war protestors..   Just *imagine* what would happen post-Patriot Act if authorities faced that now?
I provide the defintion of *agnosticism* in Webster's Unabridged Dictionary below.  The first definition is, "the doctrine of an agnostic: distinguished from atheism."
How else could we imply it? I feel like it would be rude not to give a gal constructive criticism. 
Usually I don't judge people's bodies but this guy has actual man boobs
lol wtf dude just eat the pills before you eat your food.. i don't get your point of needing to mix in with your food, if anything the heat from cooking is destroying your drugs
[This page](http://bluejackets.nhl.com/club/page.htm?id=48232) says 1240 for Zanesville.
That is an EXCELLENT point that I didn't consider. I often think of the "rhythm" of a name, so this rings quite true. 
Bruce Willis must have one of the longest philtrum in history
Yeah. Commending people for their success if fucking awful.
wheres my little beep boop youtube mirror guy? :O
Awesome job on this and some quality plays. I submitted Crossover's play like 2 times just to be sure. Haha Congrats Cross! 
I'm so glad I never had to deal with that.
Weezer  Dave Matthews Band  Jack Johnson  Nirvana  Sublime
GORK IZ CUNNINGLY BRUTAL YA DOFF BASTARD! MORK IZ BRUTALLY CUNNING! ANY GIT WOT SAYS OTHER WISE IS GONNA HAFTA AVE A CHAT WIF MY CHOPPA!
haha can't believe he broke his keyboard. 
Friends in Low Places is the STH of pop country for sure.  You Never Even Called Me by My Name must be the STH  of classic country.
Dark Side of the Moon for Prog Rock.
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=VZ1NBgZmC8Y
HDMI splitter?  http://www.amazon.com/CNE86960-HDMI-Splitter-Amplifier-Display/dp/B0015YRMXI
The whole controversy ended up being [based on faulty science](http://www.nytimes.com/2016/01/23/sports/football/nfl-ignores-ball-deflation-science-at-new-england-patriots-expense.html?_r=0) but the idea was that the Patriots players would have an easier time catching/carrying the ball with less air.
Squelch can stop a Planeswalker activation, not Ulamog's cast trigger. 
Have you heard The Arrogant Sons of Bitches?
It's like he absorbed some of her.
Medvedev
Hey! I found the best tactic is to get close to him with your shield up when he starts spin, then slowly walk backwards as he spins. This should give you plenty of time and your shield shouldn't break; at least until the very end. If you're still having trouble after this, feel free to add me on Steam and i'll give you a hand. My username is xalian147
[Tomoya Okazaki.](http://i.imgur.com/ZGmQOop.gif)
shitbot flair rural_npc
HYPE
Has there ever been a case in MMA history where a fight's decision was overturned because of of politics? Like where the promoter didn't like the judge's results, so they sent out tapes, had it rejudged, then declared a new winner? Is this even legal?
The number of playlists is embarrassing, the art direction could use lots of work, vehicles are sorta lame in H5, community integration doesn't exist virtually. Stop asking for the exact same Halo again. The sandbox in Halo 5 is great, but we already have plenty of franchises who give us the same game every year...Call of Duty is a good example. Let's let the combat evolve with Halo, please.
Well I was just pointing out the obvious............. So fuck you 
Fur Elise?
I see it as a good but not excellent experience. For example, if that occurs and they're also 5-10 minutes late picking me up, I'll give them 4 stars. I was told by a driver that they have to meet a certain rating (4.7 star IIRC) to get the best pay.
All those comments talking about not wanting to drink GMO coffee. No where in the article does it say anything about genetic modification. 
Largest in the avian world.
Gods man, gods.
I've had to replace them at the diesel pumps five or six times in the six months I've worked at this transport company. The drivers that do it like to place it back together so it looks fine, and the next guy has to deal with it. It's like a ten minute fix, maybe.
When you suck up water it mixes with the air/fuel mixture and water doesn't compress and combust so your engine just stops. If you're going at high RPMs and or are just plain unlucky your piston rods CAN bend. 
My best advice is to stay in the underground. Forever.
No unfortunately not that one, but thanks for the response!
Inter-type Morty combinations confirmed: Buff/Wrestler Morty + Punk Morty = Michael Jenkins Morty.  Car Morty would definitelly OHKO him every time, though.
Any chance he could have just deleted the recovery emails? I mean more often than not that's what hijackers do with emails, they don't change the password but just use it and get private info from it for accounts, and then sell that information to others online.
Nah, that's you calling back to the high school days. Calling people 'nerds.' Grow up,  you fuck.
*blush* well, I mean, you're not *really* a bitch, it's just what we say. We're sorry!
Great. And it sounds like he's been doing this for months. 
sorry mate
As far as I know, that only applies to casting a spell as a bonus action.
They could do a game show where they go through funny rule 34 comments. Could be a good 8 minute video.
I kinda agree with you on the whole name thing. Proper casters tend to use their name with their handle in the middle like:  Sean "Day[9]" Plot  Players or streamers who are mainly known under their pseudonym tend to stick with it for ease and for originality.  I'm not known as a player as much as I am a caster and hence my Twitter is @StefanHeroes, easy to find with my real name. But in game I'm "Axilla" and so that is how a lot of people identify me, as "Ax" or "Axilla".
doot doot
2015 Academy Awards. 
Why isnt Super Saiyan Bardock a Top Tier? he also has 25% ATK to ALL ... just like some Z-Tier
Could also be Carol. I think that's more of an emotional trainwreck for Daryl.
I think Kante is more of a worker and Dier is better at positioning and linking up the defense with Eriksen.
Won't happen because it's a major SQ42 asset. Remember, they don't want any big spoilers. You'll probably get your Idris once SQ42 is done.
Atlanta sends 2 teams to the second round. GT wins a couple ACCT games to get an at large bid and finds a way to get through, GSU gets their offense together enough to win the SBCT and beat their first round matchup.
It is, and good catch! Hello, Aunt Alicia! 
Probably to debunk the theory that this isn't a DIVERSE movement #IT'S AN ALL AMERICAN MOVEMENT The dishonest media needs a slap in the face!
Check out chapter 1 of these notes for an introduction if you want a bit more rigour.  http://www.damtp.cam.ac.uk/user/tong/statphys.html
I came here like 3 months in, and never left.  I love it.  The other place is ok, but I always felt like it had to be all about the kid specifically, like "my kid is doing X, is it normal?"  Or kid brags.  Or various things like that.  I like here that all that is welcome, but it's welcome to talk about real life and non-kid stuff and make friends and all that!  And not as much abbreviation.  
Do you parents know you are on reddit?
I'm guessing he, like most of us, did not expect Delly to be this good. Delly is absolutely killing it and that means Mo isn't going to get many minutes, especially if he's hurt
[](/discordgrump)Fine, fine.  Let me know if you want anything else.
I recall that reimu from touhou had an unofficial superpower of being able to eat sweets and not get fat.  I think I already have a mild version of that power but I'd like to extend it to not getting cavities too. 
I agree!  I'm mostly a lurker but I check in a lot. I found this sub while looking for book recommendations and then stayed because it's so great :)
Floors 11-20 + Mirror Stage 1
thanks champ 
How do i add songs to it?
Dear Baby Basketball Jesus,   I would like a win please?  Love always,  agentfelix
Just realized that I already tried the Cosrx and my skin didn't react well to it... Can you give me the quote of the other items to 78520?   Edit: Also includong 1 mbd black pearl and 1 apple masks
I think "Take the A Train" might be the right answer for jazz.
I didn't, it chose me.
I don't think they really know what they have in Exum yet, and he's honestly more of a SG mold than a PG.
We watched a film in sixth grade then split up between boys and girls to ask questions.  This seemed fine and only a few pregnancies a year.  That is until a sub handed out a John Birch Society article to students.  The article covered how it would be great to round up the gays and put them on an island to die of AIDS, it would be win-win.  She was quietly let go. The next week classes were suspended for 3 days.  As a school we watched videos.  We had discussions by class, or by gender.  They mixed it up and educated us about sex, pregnancy, rape, molestation, diseases, AIDS and even discussed having a healthy sex life. They finished with people who had experience with diseases.  Our mild mannered, uber Christian shop teacher served in the military.  We never knew that rather than go to Vietnam, he got a job rounding up hookers and GIs for their shots.  The stories we were told about drug resistant gonorrhea made all the guys cross their legs.  Over the next few weeks one molestation case and a rape came forward and there were almost zero high school pregnancies for the next two years.
http://i.imgur.com/Es3o287.jpg
they would have, if drinking a can of this stuff was part of the visa requirement.
I could absolutely see Batshuayi making a move to N. London. Marseille aren't qualifying for European play next year. We can offer him that. 
It's the best meme that HBO (who is financing Hillary) could come up with to counter Trump. 
Acestream rules, thanks
thanks, I assumed as much, another question answered.
This ties in to how you gain the ability to hotswap after your mind starts to become one with the system.
I am well off enough to recognize large differences in production and consumption since 2009. Anybody paying any attention to the energy market would be able to let you in on that little secret. Hint: it is why Nigeria is imploding and why you are buying cheap gas. It is also why the US changed a law regarding energy export that, in 2009, most experts didn't ever believe would need to change.
Well he did well at Dota 2 and now in cs:go Great work man ti3 and mlg were the only tournaments that i enjoyed tbh.
Before Kishi lost Obito &amp; Rin? I think you're talking about Kakashi not Kishi. 
Its kinda useless.   I mean,sure you'd be stopping them for a few seconds,and it could help against Ash,but it just feels so situational,and I feel like most of the time he/she would just be used for his/her guns (I mean,a defender with an assault rifle? Its nice you know).
Dude that would be awesome! Youd have to give them to somebody as  a middle man as im on XB1 maybe one of the mods would help out but that would be sweet the responce to these have been better than expected 
It's called friction welding.  Which technically isn't even welding, but whatever
&gt; Take the 25 million people who watched Dreamhack Cluj. Say 1.5 million people bet on that game  Did you pull that number out of thin air or do you have any kind of source for it? You can't just make an estimate and then say "that's not as enormous as people think it is", just because you guessed that it is less. :D
Damn... this was a good one. One of those that really made my skin crawl as waves of revulsion overcame me. 
The police being present at a peaceful protest that is likely to attract the violent attack of racists does not make them look bad.  Except in the case of the violent racists who attacked the peaceful protest.  They probably think a police presence would be a bad thing.  They are probably pretty happy that the police absence gave them a window in which they could mount an effective attack.
&gt;Please don't comeback to me saying "a decision can be purely political and still within the law"  Why not? Because that's what I exactly meant. We're in a debate but you're telling me I'm not allowed to come back with the obvious counter-argument? lmao.  I think the Supreme Court's decision was politically motivated but within the law. It's not impossible to comprehend. Why should something politically motivated be illegal in the first place?
As a business owner I do, if I was being audited, and running for office my lawyer would be telling me the same thing. Any lawyer worth his price would tell you that. Anyone says otherwise do not understand business, plus not like Trump's return is some 3 page EZ form. Frankly I agree with Mark Cuban and feel tax returns should be private. But understand why they are politicized.  I agree with you on Clinton's emails/Speeches, those are non-issue for her supporters. It is just politics to try to discredit her, which as a Trump supporter I understand.  This is assuming of course she hasn't  violated any laws in regards to the emails, which I doubt but the FBI has not finished thier investigation.
Try r/sneakermarket
awesome Ill give it a try later. Im skeptical on my end when i do a dry test of the network connection it says I have a hardware failure the wireless card is shot and needs to be sent for repair. Hope thats wrong and Its just Live being wonky
The environments of koth_suijin, pl_borneo, and koth_king aren't seen too often. I'd really like to see another official map in an urban or tropic setting.
You're an asshole! Hehehe.
ijrodraseg 1500 elo 1.2 kd willing to join up
scum they are 
I think you answered your own question.  Culver city sounds like your best bet. 
**A Feast for Crows, by George R.R. Martin**
Creatures sucked, is the point
Source: http://www.cracked.com/article_23048_6-berserk-true-stories-pro-wrestling-life-road_p2.html
&gt;What ties exactly do they even have?  [Justin Trottier.](https://nowtoronto.com/news/mens-rights-whitewash/) And a board member or two.  &gt;That was me asking you what's so bad about AVFM anyways  There's not a single question in your post.  &gt;Even if they acknowledge each other  CAFE goes *far* out of its way *not* to acknowledge AVFM, in order to maintain its veneer of legitimacy.
Can I ask how you found this? I tried searching for it myself on family search and still could find it via their names. And I don't see a collection for Saints Peter and Paul church records. Am I missing something obvious? I'd like to learn so I can maybe find more people later on. Thanks!
Then we watch  Dallas burn in cap hell and wish Kirk good luck. Every player has a price for which we would let them walk.
I will never forget the "fashionable goth" outfit. 
you have to go back..  ^you ^have ^to ^go ^back..
I don't know much about l4d2 updates, but tf2 updates are far from lacking, it is at a pretty decent rate  Valve games are known for having a huge life span, and that isn't easy to do. Just because they don't release new games constantly and decide to improve their current ones instead doesn't mean they aren't a game company. But if you prefer companies releasing games every year and cutting the support to it as soon as there is no more dlc to be released and then being shut down while they still have a player base, that's with you. I for one value being able to play the same I bought 10 years ago because the community isn't dead nor the servers are shut down.
Have you tried spamming delete when the comp is starting, also does your keyboard or mouse light up when you turn on the power?
I could be down for an after party!
Someone please bring up Schaub talking about Carwin in a thong lol
http://i.imgur.com/IlsqWR1.gifv
oh fuck me didnt read properly : (
Hi there, I would try contract/relax in the split position. When contracting, try to slide up and in the relax part, really relax (!). You might want to slightly support with your hands so that you don'T go for a too hard of a stretch. You could also stretch the muscles separately; stretch the hamstrings and the hip flexors.  I've wrote a post about stretching and recorded a video. It's not about the split, but there is a few things you might like.  Here: http://ericsaintonge.com/stretching-how-and-when/
mine does its part in keeping me alive every day....   clears out the cobwebs.
youre right it isn't even pinned to my bar
tbh they deal more dmg but they're less tanky I remember shen in s2 you literally needed 5 people hitting him for 20 sec to kill him.
Or if the 5 beats the 4 and there are no other upsets. 
Well you're a middle of the mall bitch
Congratulations! We're sending you home with a complimentary neck brace!
Thanks for being reasonable unlike some others in this thread. Still holding that the cut was good, you all can't really see from the picture so it's all guess work. I've smoked plenty of Camachos and never had this happen.  Thanks!
Oh I definitely appreciate Job, so no knock to the book. You do have to know what your getting into before you read it though. If you just randomly decide to read it one day like many people would it's mostly just a group of guys sitting around talking. 
lol..  "once upon a time...  this morning"
If you've got a full party grinding for them, they take awhile but they aren't the worst thing ever. The issue is getting 6-8 people available for a few hours at a time to do it.
I couldn't make out the thumbnail on mobile,but I knew it was Gary Oldman
Sharing is caring...
He's stronger, more durable, has ridiculous telepathy, has way more powerful energy projection, etc.   He regularly beats groups of people on Clark's level around. 
Wow, OP. Well-written! How did your parents respond?
Yeah I'm not a big fan of under armour but they are dope. He gets colourways made specifically for each kit. There is a black and orange pair too right?
&gt; 45 carbs per meal is batshit crazy lol  For you, maybe. Some people have different tolerances; I can eat up to 25 carbs per meal without going over 140.
Cumulus does L3, but has limited table sizes due to the hardware.  Taking a default-free BGP feed will be 5-10x too many routes for the HW.  I don't know of any ON routers available today.  A single (or pair of) MX router(s) at the edge of the DC cluster network is a common solution.  They become the default route for the cluster, and route to your multiple upstream providers.  The cluster network still has routes for the entire cluster, but to get to/from the Internet, you go through the edge routers.
added
IGN: diirty_sprite  Age: 16  Past factions: ruthless,coastal,Compton,milkyway,lunar,Equinox,drop,obz,mcdolans,borderpatrol  PvP: 8/10 don't drop and stick with team  Communication: 9/10 only talk when I need to  BB: 9/10 will do anything around the base  Timezone: Pst  Activity: 1-2 hours on schooldays however much I want on weekends  Rank: pro
That's closer to Whitesnake's layout with the fire buttons on the throttle.  How do you like that?  I still have them on the main stick.  I use dynamic zoom in and out on the forward and back of the bottom thumb hat, where you have missile fire/lock.  All my targeting and views are on the stick, I also have your current target nearest enemy as my push to talk key.  Landing systems, both toggle and automatic mode, are the only thing on the base buttons at the moment.  I'll probably add match velocity there, as it's something I would probably only use out of combat.  For throttle max, I use the slider on the base
Sure, if you would be willing to trade 1:1? I will breed that Dratini and I should be able to trade in 4 hours or so.
Sounds awesome! My town or yours?(:
Yep, just on last version of Reinand. Just a little nervous because of potential bricking that I've read about. I'll try this, thanks. 
[How-2-Streetwear, a Guide by Waversack.](https://www.reddit.com/r/streetwear/comments/3zaccy/waversacks_2016_guide_to_streetwear/) 
oh no around these parts we call em like we see em. Night Walkers!
Doh!
Nothing to be nervous about. This fake issue never had any traction and if it did anything at all it gained Trump a few thousand more votes. Vox is a shit source on top of it. 
What here is indicative of abuse to you?  I take workouts really seriously, I would be a bit mad if I go to exercise with someone and they want me to stop my workout so they can go home.  Like if you aren't feeling well and have to stop, okay, but let me finish unless you're like deathly ill.  No disrespect to the OP, I know you weren't feeling well and that sucks.  
Starting from Carmi is better 
Exactly how much are the max salaries?
Is/are there another WWII pfs coming?
Sauced over in Paseo is where my sister and I like to go with her kids. People bring their pets and play board games. 
